 
 
Was communism really that bad??
 
 
Tell me the pros and cons of the soviet union and why the western world hated them so much. Also wat should the U.S.A. have done to root out communist spies instead of their "Witch" hunts and what countries are the true communists in our present world?

-Hans
 
 
Yes it was that bad, and worse. It wasn't hated just by the west either. We hated it too. At least those of us who were on the 'wrong side'. But your questions are too many too broad. What are you seeking? any particular aim to this or just curiosity?
 
 
Mainly after the stalin years i want to know what was so bad in soviet russia.

-Hans
 
 
The Soviet Union was one of the world's most oppressive and murderous governments ever. The DPRK, with a far smaller stage, has done its best to replicate Stalin's system. Ruthlessness has typified all of the so-called communist regimes.

Its hard to imagine how terrible a world we would have today if Hitler and the Axis Powers had not been defeated. Many on the Left seem to have a blind spot when it comes to the Communist block. The Cold War was just as earnest, and fought with just as deadly purpose as WWII. The campaigns and conflicts of the Cold War were often fought in the shadows, and almost always between clients of the two contending sides. When U.S. forces were required, the conflicts were always depicted as if they were separate events, not campaigns in a larger conflict. We "won" by stalemating the DPRK, and, though Vietnam was a political loss, the US/West demonstrated its willingness to directly confront the Communist threat. The political loss in Vietnam was not on the battlefield, but in the livingrooms of America, and the consequences were immediatly evident in other SE Asian countries, SW Asia and Africa. Even so, in the long run the United States prevailed because its political system and economy was far superior to that of the Soviet Block.
 
 
If the U.S. really has a problem with communism, they'd better get serious about Korea.
 
 
Ok maybe the soviets were bad but in cuba they love castro yet the americans call them "evil" whats with that??

-Hans
 
 
 
Ruthlessness has typified all of the so-called communist regimes.
 

This is a falsehood.
 
 
We are serious about the DPRK. Our commitment to the security of ROK is firm, though recently we've announced troop reductions of about one third. Kim Jong-Il is in his sixties. He seems to be in reasonably good health, and there are some signs that American willingness to directly engage Saddam did not fall on deaf ears.

DPRK is one of the most dangerous regimes on the planet for several reasons. First, is the military threat they pose to ROK. They have at least some nuclear warheads, and short/medium range delivery systems. They have been developing longer range missiles, but haven't proceeded to the stacking stage yet on them. They have the world's largest special forces units, and large numbers of infantry/artillery/tank regiments. A very high percentage of DPRK first line units are deployed very close to the DMZ, and DPRK artillery can reach well into Seoul. On the other hand they have virtually no air power, and the DPRK naval forces are very poor, though they have a small number of Soviet diesel submarines capable of operating within theater. The threat of the DPRK renewing the Korean War at this time is regarded as low. Jong-Il is unlikely to risk taking on the U.S. Military as long as it is an effective presence in ROK, the U.S. Navy in theater, the Marines on Okinawa, and Airbases in Japan. Jong-Il is eccentric, but not crazy enough to risk loss of power by engaging the US directly.

DPRK is desperately poor, with almost its entire productivity devoted to maintaining one of the world's largest armies. The economy has repeatedly been on the brink of complete collapse, and only supplies from ROK and the United States have prevented collapse several times in the last 20 years. The economy is almost entirely agricultural, but is unable to feed the population. Starvation is a constant threat, and many refugees slip over the border into PRC to beg food. The Party and the Military are fed well, but children suffer chronic malnutrition. Almost the only exports are military supplies, i.e., cheap knockoffs of soviet designed rifles, missiles, etc. There are some strong indications that DPRK has been helping Iran develop a nuclear capacity by exporting vital materials. The danger is that DPRK seems to have no compunction against selling anything to anyone if they have the hard currency.

The DPRK is also a threat to the region if it should suddenly collapse, or if famine becomes much worse in the countryside. The people of the DPRK are probably the world's most brainwashed, and significant numbers have completely "bought into" the propaganda they've been fed for over fifty years. To unleash hordes of starving people on ROK and/or the PRC would be very destabilizing to those economies. Add to that the political fanaticism of many North Koreans and the world could have some really tough problems.

Never trust anything coming out of DPRK. This is a regime who has no compunction about lying, and they only respect force. Give in on anything to the DPRK, and you will be fighting them over details for years as they try to exploit every nuance.

Cuba is on the cusp of change. Castro goes, and it will probably be a whole new ballgame. "Evil" is rhetoric.
 
 
I think communism has had great batches of trouble being acted out. So has capitalism. I have always been interested in the inbetween, and the inbetween has always been excoriated in my immediately accessible press. Leaving aside, if you can breathe in, the millions who have died on various sides, just looking at the ideas, why is it ideas are so frightening? wouldn't it be better, gee, now we can do it computeresquely, to extrapolate to futures and talk about matters?

In my view, the extremes of capitalism are not good for ordinary humans either.
 
 
 
but in cuba they love castro
 

I doubt it. Of course, it is impossible to measure in any comprehensive way, since Castro's government won't allow free elections or even, say, neutral opinion polls or anything. So all we have to go on is anecdotal evidence of various kinds. On the one hand, the Cuban press will assert that everybody does, indeed, love Castro, but then the opposite opinion would not be allowed to be printed. On the other hand, dissident activists relay how many Cubans are disgruntled, and many still risk their life trying to flee across the sea.

Then there is the simple, yet ambiguous anecdotal evidence of what any random Cuban "on the street" will tell, say, a holiday-goer or journalist about what he thinks of Castro. I'll illustrate how it is ambiguous by recounting an anecdote.

In 1986, I went with my family to Poland and then to Prague, in Czechoslovakia. In Poland, the 1980 insurrection had been beaten down and just two years before, a dissident priest had been murdered by officers of the Security Service. People were angry, and did not hesitate for a second to tell us so, cursing General Jaruzelski right behind the backs of marching soldiers. Churches had demonstrative memorials for the priest. In Prague, however, noone came up to us to speak bad of the Communist regime there. In fact, noone much came up to us at all. The one or two times we gently probed someone's general opinion about anything political at all, they'd change the subject.

Now arguably, the whole thing proved that in Poland, where people complained about the Communist regime all the time, there was more freedom than in Czechoslovakia, where noone said anything bad about it at all. So one needs to trod carefully with anecdotal evidence...
 
 
Poland and Hungary were less stalinist than totalitarian Czechoslovakia. Kadar's (Hungary) motto 'who's not against us, is with us' vs. the stalinist 'who's not with us, is against us' (sounds familiar?). But everywhere you would find that elections were 99% in favor of the Communist Party ( if you didn't vote the right way, your child just won't make it to the school of his/her choice or you'll lose your job) and you'd find millions participating in the celebrations of the 1st of May - carefully staged and obligatory. Does that prove people loved the regime? Not in the least. The only people who dared to speak out spent years in prison, were followed, former professors worked as manual workers, etc. etc. Even in Poland and Hungary, at least until 1988, before the first power-sharing attempts.
 
 
Just to show the other side of the coin
Yes, the communist regimes were very oppressive, did not tolerate free speech and a range of other rights we take for granted. On the other hand they did believe in the right to a job and in education.

Before Castro rural Cuba was desperately poor and uneducated. The Castro regime brought education to the masses as well as free medical care, etc. Those were real improvements that gave him a large following (whatever the US propaganda likes you to believe). No popular uprising has occurred against Castro despite all the efforts of the CIA.

Unfortunately for the Cubans, the social benefits deteriorated after the fall of the Soviet Union, because they were the main trade partner of Cuba, which as you might know is still under a US embargo after 40 years. The US sanctions are actually what keeps Castro in power, because he can blame all adversity on the US. It has been this spiteful attitude of the US and their support of capitalist right wing dictatorships that have created the circumstances for communist and socialist movements to grow in Latin and South America.

I read the other day that the Bush administration wants to sharpen the embargo "so that the Castro regime will fall sooner", yeah right!

The point I am trying to make is that capitalism is not all good and communism is not all bad. A middle way combining the benefits of both systems in a democratic set up is an achievable ideal. International polls invariably rank the pluriform moderate social democratic countries in the north of Europe as prime examples of progress: best education, heath care, welfare, environmental concern, democratic rights, standard of living and general level of satisfaction. Oh, and also: best track record on human rights.
 
 
No, the practice of communism was not really that bad... it was much, much worse...
 
 
I can't compare - like others here - with personal experiences in different communist countries, since I've only been to the "Capital of the German Democratic Republic Berlin" [that has been the official of that city!] a couple of times, got visits by (those selected) GDR-citizens and had a some pen-friends over there.

With this somehow narrowed view I can say:

Set is right here again: re " practise of communism" and re "worse".
 
 
Re: Just to show the other side of the coin

 
The point I am trying to make is that capitalism is not all good and communism is not all bad.
 

The opposite of capitalism is not communism, it's socialism. Communism is just a totalitarian perversion of socialism. In my opinion.

Welcome to A2K, Paaskynen, good to see another European. Havent had many Finns here yet.
 
 
Acautally, the opposite of capitalism is collectivism... c.f., the "Diggers" in 17th century England, and Le Boeuf's trial and execution during the rule of the Directory... Marx, reading in the British Library, was much influenced by both of these...
 
 
The only real large thing that went wrong in communist nations is they didn't actually completely follow marxs' guidelines. To be a communist nation first you must turn the government into a kind of dictatorship, to stabilize the country then proceed from there(Leaders give up there dictorial rule) but as we all know in some little way we are all corrupt and will corrupt power if we get it. Also remember "absolute power corrupts".

-Hans
 
 
Marx didn't exactly put out a clear set of guidelines on what to do after gaining power. His was a good analysis of the social changes that had taken place up to his time, but the further into the future his theories reached, the more abstract and unspecific they were. Nothing much to minutely "follow up" on there, when drafting the latest five-year plan.

However, the "dictatorship of the proletariat" Marx envisioned did likely not have much to do with what we now call a "dictatorship" - or with "stabilising the country", for that matter. Marx 101, from  Wikipedia  :

 
Prior to 1871, Karl Marx said little about what in practice would characterize [the dictatorship of the proletariat], believing that planning in advance the details of a future socialist regime constituted the fallacy of "utopian socialism." Marx used the term "dictatorship" to describe absolute control by an entire class (rather than a single sovereign individual) over another class [..]. Thus Marx called capitalism the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, which he believed would be superseded by socialism (the dictatorship of the proletariat) [..]

However, although Marx did not plan out the details of how such a dictatorship would be implemented, he did point to the Paris Commune of 1871 as an example of a society in his own lifetime that put his ideas into practice. [..] Frederick Engels, in his 1891 postscript to the work, summarized this position, and praised the democratic features of this government, when he wrote: "In this first place, it filled all posts -- administrative, judicial, and educational -- by election on the basis of universal suffrage of all concerned, with the right of the same electors to recall their delegate at any time. [..]
 
 
 
"The only real large thing that went wrong in communist nations is,,," they are ruthless in their willingness to subvert humanity to a fanatical ideal. At best, they are always, and must be, dictatorships forever trying to force human nature into utopian formulas. At worst, they are an excuse for one group of thugs to exploit and enslave entire societies. They deprive individuals of initiative and often even of hope. In communist societies, the individual is always subservient to the State and they are of no consequence in the balance. They are based on fear, force and brutal violence directed at anyone who questions the ideal currently being forced upon the masses by the few. They detest freedom of thought and speech. The communist State has no shame, no pity, no justice. Communism is a long nightmare, and it's amazing that anyone can still find anything good to say for it as a political system.
 
 
Communism, at least the Leninist brand, failed as a social and economical system.
It failed everywhere.

It failed miserably in Cuba, too.

There are many myths about pre-Revolutionary Cuba. Yes, it was under a corrupt capitalist dictatorship. Yes, the income distribution was bad. Yes, it was the US brothel. But no, it was NOT desperately poor and uneducated, at least under Latin American standards. And no, their income distribution was not among the worst in the world. We are not talking Haiti here.

Cuba has the highest literacy rate in Latin America. And until the 90s it had the highest health standards in the region. This, plus agrarian reform, are the historical conquests of the Revolution.

What has been the price for those conquests?

Let's start with food rationing -if you don't buy stuff in the black market you starve. Literally.

Let's continue with other rationing. Two bars of soap per family every six months; two reels of harsh toilet paper per family every six months; a pair of shoes every two years...

Let's go on: permanent electricity shortage; there are blackouts every other day, they last hours; big deficit in public transportation (there's hardly any private transport); no toys for children, since the 90s.

Now the main stuff. As a reader, you have two choices: "Granma", the newspaper of the Cuban Communist Party or "Trabajadores", the newspaper of the Cuban Communist Youth. 4 pages each. Only propaganda. Good alternative for toilet paper.
Access to the internet? You need to subscribe, after a thourghout political screening, with the only provider, the State, who has a huge firewall.
TV? Two channels, both controlled by the State. Six daily hours each.
Access to books, magazines, or any printed material from outside Cuba? Forbidden.
Political participation: yes. In the Revolution Defense Commitees (CDRs) or in the Fast Action Brigades (BARs or BRRs). The CDRs are organized in every neigborhood: their main job is to spy on the neighbors activities and to make sure everyone participates in government sponsored activities. The BARs job is to hastle and disturb any one who minimally opposes the government (throw stones at their house, beat them in the street, etc). One out of four Cubans is an informant for the G-2, the Political Police.

Let's continue: people work as little as they can, and try to cheat the State as much as it's possible. "The State pretends to pay me, I pretend to work" is the motto.
A culture of falseness, fear and cynicism has been inyected into the populace. If they don't know you, they'll speak wonders of Fidel. If they know you, they'll often show hatred and dispair.

I am from Cuban descent.
My mother was a member of Directorio 26-J, the Movement that brought Castro into power.
My mother's family lived in Cuba until the late 90s.
My cousin was a party member, and had been a believer (I remember one night, in 1992, when he cried like a baby: everything he had fought for in his life was crap).

The Cuban inteligentsia knows what's going on.
A well-known entertainer told me once, about ten years ago, almost in a whisper: "The Revolution is dead. We live in a Fascist Police State"

The Cuban nomenklatura knows that people hate them.
My cousin's father-in-law is the party chief in a minor city in central Cuba. When his daughter told him they were going to leave the country, he answered, full of anger: "When the Revolution falls and the mob thrashes my body through the streets of our city, you will be among them".

------

The ideals of Communism are good. But the dreams of reason generate monsters. Fidel Castro and his regime are some of those monsters.
 
 
You can say the same about bush he thinks the only proper government is democracy, but he is not only forcing it down to his own people but also is making other countries follow suit. "Praise capitalism and all its benefits"...thats bull. Even a well organized dictatorship can work more effectively and beneficially to the people. Cuba is not on the brink of changing and maybe if the americans opened up their minds a bit the cubans can improve their economy through trade. the americans are out to shape the world in their image! So don't through a cold shoulder to communism when capitalism has just as many faults.

-Hans
 
 
I am against the Cuban embargo.

It affacts the people. and is counterproductive. It gives Castro the perfect excuse to continue with his policies.

---

Hans, I understand your original question is not about Capitalism, but about Communism.

Savage Capitalism is terrible and unhuman.
Communism is just not the answer to it.
 
 
Hans, have you lived in communism?
 
 
Don't really remember anything (was born in east germany (berlin) in 1984).

-Hans
 
 
well, if you were to live in communism, you would know that you can't compare it with capitalism. Ot, to say it better, you can't compare "holes" and faults in capitalism with those of communism.
Can't say for others, but dagmaraka and myself both lived in communism and in capitalism.

And I lived in BY FAR most free and most developed communistic country of all times, and I would still always choose capitalism with all its faults.
If I would have to choose best kind of society I would say it's Scandinavian type of socialism though.
 
 
Canada as well is kind of socialist.

-Hans
 
 
Signing off for a bit i'll be on later.

-Hans
 
 
 
Canada as well is kind of socialist.
 

Only in the "is not socialist at all" way right?
 
 
damn, I wanted to say that.....

 
 
 
No it is it has free heath care and tones of other social programs, unless you live in the country you can't really tell(I moved here about 15 years ago)
 
 
fbaezer, thank you, for your long post above.

<nods>
 
 
I agree with MOU (and with nimh).

Yugoslavia was a country with seemingly reasonable freedoms, who tried to put some imagination into the construction of Socialism.
In the seventies, it had the same product per capita as Mexico, but apparently there was much less poverty and misery.
In 1979 I travelled to Bulgaria and, to my astonishment, I found out that American propaganda was closer to the truth than the propaganda of the Soviet bloc. It was so oppressive, that after a few days, my wife and I decided to take the first plane anywhere. Arriving at Zagreb was like breathing oxygen for the first time.
But Yugoslavia imploded. Communism didn't work there, either, perhaps for different reasons.
Now, after the war, only Slovenia has a better standard of living than Mexico, and Croatia is about at the same level. The rest of the former Yugoslavia lags far behind.

BTW, Canada is not socialist at all. Only their brand of market Capitalism is not as savage as in the US.
 
 
 
No it is it has free heath care and tones of other social programs
 

Of, so it's a country with free healthcare and tons of social programs.

This does not constitute socialism.

 
unless you live in the country you can't really tell(I moved here about 15 years ago)
 

IMO knowing what the word means would be a more important insight.
 
 
;-)
 
 
Are you new or something do you want me to go in depth explanation, i just gave you a few samples i'll give you the whole deal if you want me to. social programs and health care are attributes of a socialist government perhaps it is you who needs to update your knowledge on these things! We along with finland sweden are probably the most socialist governments in the world if you doubt me don't tell me ask your local governor, MP or whatever your damn country has in local ridings!!!

-Hans
 
 
We don't have ridings... with our politicians, if they were facing backward, one could not tell one horse's ass from the other...
 
 
Hans, your samples are wrong. If anyone needs to read up, it's not Craven. Canada, Finland, Sweden are at best social democracies (I would still not place Canada into the same bag with Scandinavian countries), but not socialist countries.
repeat: universal healthcare and social programs do not equal socialism. liberal democracies, that are all based on capitalist economy, have a vast array of welfare systems. canada's is more distributive, but it still does not make it a socialist country. before you tell someone off, get your facts straight.
 
 
 
. social programs and health care are attributes of a socialist government
 

Health care and socail programs were first ever introduced in Germany, in 1884, by the Prussian Prime Minister and Chancellor of the German Reich, Otto von Bismarck.

Bismarck was famous - besides others - for his Anti-Socialist Laws of 1878, which suppressed organisations that represented the working classes. (He feared Marxism and the Social Democrats threatening his leadership.)
 
 
 
Are you new or something do you want me to go in depth explanation,
 

Feel free to attempt an in-depth explanation.

 
i just gave you a few samples i'll give you the whole deal if you want me to.
 

Go for it.

 
social programs and health care are attributes of a socialist government perhaps it is you who needs to update your knowledge on these things!
 

Leaders and followers are "attributes of a socialist government".... and other governments that are not socialist.

Similarly social programs and health care can exist in a governmental system that does not even resemble socialism.

I'm quite interested in you "updating my knowledge" but do consider that the logical premise of your claim is such that finding a similarity is being used to assert an equitable state.

This is a logical flaw, as you can find similarities between capitalist states and socialist ones, which is precisely what you dis, and subsequently try to assert a falsehood, which is also preciselty what you did.

Canada has larger government than some countries, it is also very much a capitalist, and no socialist, state.

 
We along with finland sweden are probably the most socialist governments in the world
 

Again, only through equivocation with the use of "socialist".

For example, Cuba and North Korea are "more socialist".

 
if you doubt me don't tell me ask your local governor
 

My local govenor is not very bright, and is not an authority on government.

Furthermore, finding people who will agree with you is not indicative of your premise being correct and is only indicative of a shared position.

Since humans can share false positions this does not preclude falsehood in your statement.

Canada is not a socialist country. Even some people who will say so rhetorically to denigrate Canada's "leftness" would likely admit their use of hyperbole.
 
 
Canada, at least as long as I've lived here which would be...all my life, has generally been described as a "social democracy". What the hell that means, I have no clue, but I know it isn't Socialism.
 
 
Hans, how would you define the difference between socialism and social-democracy?

An on a second note, does Adenauer's track record in laying the ground work for much of Germany's present-day social programs make the CDU historically a socialist party?
 
 
Who's going to tell Brian Mulroney he was Prime Minister of a socialist country? I think I can feel John Diefenbaker spinning in his grave.  
 
 
In 1943, the Co-operative Commonwealth Federation formed the opposition in Ottawa. In 1944, Douglas and the CCF won the provincial elections and formed the government in Saskatchewan. And that's as close as Canada ever came to socialism. In 1958, the CCF won only eight seats in Parliament, which meant they would not be represented there as a party. They combined with the Labour Congress and formed the New Democratic Party in 1961. Even the New Democrats aren't socialist by contemporary standards, nevermind the "classic" definition of socialism prevalent in the west in the 1930's. The Liberals quickly saw the threat posed by the CCF. In 1939, the Canadian census determined that fully two thirds of Canadians were subsisting below the poverty level. The Liberals co-opted CCF policies, and brought in old-age pensions, unemployment insurance, family allowances (for you 'Mericans, that's the same as ADC) and medicare (once again, for the 'Mericans, everybody is elligible for medicare in Canukistan, not just the old folk). That is, they brought those programs in and expanded them when they weren't being knocked down by the Tories (... hex-cuse me... the Progressive Conservatives), as the two parties rushed to the doorway to get "man of the people" credibility by choosing the "acceptable" parts of the Regina Manifesto.

We've got all of those programs in the New Nited States, 'cept for medicare, which we only give to the ones we're betting won't live much longer. Hardly makes Canadia look very socialist to me.
 
 
 
Who's going to tell Brian Mulroney he was Prime Minister of a socialist country? I think I can feel John Diefenbaker spinning in his grave.  
 

Never mind them, Hamburger should be able to step out his door, and hear John MacDonald spinning in his grave...
 
 
Set, if you feel like it and happen to have some time on your hands, could you tell us some more about the history of the CCF?

I gather the CCF was the most leftist of prominent parties Canada's had, but still was not socialist? Did it compare more with LaFollette Progressives then, perhaps? How did they come to have a bulwark in Saskatchewan and did they have other bulwarks - what were its main constituencies? How far back did its history go, and did it maintain any ties with parties in other countries? Can a "CCF line" still be discerned in today's NDP?

See, noone else would I dare ask all these questions all at once... just with you, I'm gambling you actually enjoy them. If not, safely ignore! ;-)
 
 
One review of Tommy Douglas and the CCF  click... 
 
 
Lots of good stuff at the CBC archives. Interesting radio clips. Tommy Douglas was a dynamic speaker. (one of his Kiefer Sutherland - I think at least some part of his 'presence' comes from Tommy)

 cbc archives 
 
 
The CCF was formed from an amalgam of farmers cooperatives (yes, like the Grange, considered socialist in America at the time of it's inception, but La Follette's programs for Wisconsin would be closer to the mark), trades union associations and actual, real live, doughnut eatin', hockey playin' Canajun socialists. The CCF was formed in 1932 in Regina. The Labour member for a riding in Winnipeg, one Mr. Woodsworth, was chosen as party leader. In the Regina Manifesto (1933), they called for the nationalization of key industries, as well as the social programs i've already mentioned. They pledged to work for a peaceful elimination of capitalism, and shortly after issuing the Manifesto, rejected communism.

Their power in the prairies came from the agricultural and industrial failures in the period known in the United States as the Great Depression. Plutocracy had been in heady ascendency right up until 1929. The government had encouraged large scale agriculture in the praries, and no consideration had been given to the climate and ecology of many of those regions. The Red River valley in Manitoba was a particularly accute example--the entire eco-system collapsed and disasterous cycles of drought and flood succeeded one another in the generation before the Wall Street crash.

Many of the immigrants to the praries had been Germans (lots of charismatic sectarians there) and Ukrainians, and they brought the memory of bloodily oppressed European socialism with them. Cities like Manitoba, Winnipeg and Calgary were in a rush to industrialize--both the United States and Canada profited greatly from what the European world knew of as the Great Depression, from 1875 to 1893. European capitalists with money to invest looked to North America for oppotunities, and liked what they found. The true story of the "wild west" in America and Canada has never been told, and likely will never be, because macro-economics and venture capitalism don't make for good cinematography.
When trades unionists formed associations and farmers started cooperatives, the west was a natural place for success for such organizations. The immigrant and the child of the immigrant were familiar with European socialism and trades unionism. When the hard times hit, they hit hardest in the west. The CCF was a natural, a shoo-in.

But the Liberals and the Tories stood not upon the order of their going, and soon were painting the CCF to be as red as the most scarlet political rhetoric could make them appear. Despite historically and repeatedly rejecting Communism, the CCF finally abandoned the Regina Manifesto in 1956. By then, it was too late.

As for New Democrats, who knows what evil lurks in their hearts and minds, apart, of course, from Lamont Cranston? The Mountie, who has resolutely denied being a New Democrat, or my sweetiepie who never has admitted to being a New Democrat, would best know the answer to that one--neither of them being New Democrats, and all. Neil Young's daddy was a New Democrat, mebbe he could tell ya. Given the hounding which the CCF suffered, with sufficient success to drive them into the parliamentary wilderness (i'm sure i'll be corrected if i am wrong, but i believe a party needs to seat 12 members in Ottawa to have standing), i rather doubt that the New Democrats would ever publicly adhere to anything like  the Regina Manifesto .
 
 
bookmark
 
 
mark twain

(word association, no?)
 
 
Alright it was to bold to say Canada is socialist, it is more then most countries but by definition i guess its not. the closer ones i believe are Finland, sweden, Norway and i think the swiss. Also it is true that in technical terms real socialist are communist and dictatorships(totaltitarian). Oh and the NDP had just recently received 19 ridings.

-Hans
 
 
Hans, have you been to the Ipsos-Reid site for analysis of the recent Canajun election results - and their perspective on why the polls didn't pan out? Interesting reading.
 
 
No i haven't but i'll take a look.

-Hans
 
 
Yes, i knew about the NDP, but as tame as they are in comparison to the CCF, i rather think they won't get into any coalition until they can seat as many, or nearly as many, as the PQ.
 
 
uhhhh you mean BQ right??
 
 
same same Boss...
 
 
Communist regimes have been brutal to their citizens. Government ownership of production is a bad idea; quality can never be achieved, because there is no motivation to improve. Equality is a bad policy; there is no incentive to do well, work hard, or improve one's standard of living. The economy will eventually collapse.
 
 
Mumble mumble.

I have a variety of hats, have been a student, a technologist, an architect, an artist, and have a publisher for my writing if I would ever get in gear. How would I do in various societies? Perhaps not so well in any of them.. There will always be yearning, as very few people on earth get pulses of pleasure from the fruition of their toil, whatever the system. Money surely is some kind of reward, but not... everything. Freedom to progress creatively and intellectually are important too.

Time to learn and create and the money to do it with... are relatively rare. Maybe the creation is a small farm that doesn't downtrod labor but does grow plants well year after year, and not to just sit in storage. Small farms have had trouble surviving in the US, as I understand it. Which form of government is best for that? And which is enabling for any child, boy or girl, to have opportunity to go all the way in school, no matter the income of the parents?

I think regimes of different sorts have good and bad and inbetween attributes. I wish that in my lifetime the world could come to some sort of general stability in combo with general freedom, and know that to do that would require a mechanism of interplay that would involve nations' self knowledge and communication between them.
Ah, never mind.
 
 
Thanks Set, interesting!
 
 
So is Bush going to do something about North Korea now??

-Hans
 
 
Short answer: No, very unlikely at this time.

President Bush is President the United States, and Commander in Chief of our military forces. That position has always, and intentionally, carried great weight about where, when and against whom our military forces operate. When the President orders our forces into action it is not to satisfy any personal feelings, but rather to secure and defend the interests of the United States. Hence, any military action ordered by President Bush is no more a "Bush" war, than 1812 was "Madison's War", the Spanish-American War was "McKinely's War", or WW!! was "Roosevelt's War".

The Korean War, begun in 1950 when the DPRK invaded ROK, is still going on. A truce is in place and hostilities have been greatly reduced, but the war goes on. U.S. and ROK forces have spent the last 50 years preparing the battlefield and drawing up contingency plans if open hostilities resume. Over the last 50 years the situation has approached open combat a number of times, once within the last decade.

The DPRK is one of the last nations dedicated to a Stalinist style dictatorship, and his headed by Kim Jong-Il. Kim is a short little eccentric who is absolute master of the DPRK who has two overriding priorities: Dynastic survival of the present system, and reunification of the Korean Peninsula under the Kim's brand of Communism. Kim is a lot of things, but he isn't crazy. The DPRK is, and has been on the economic ropes for a long time. The Party and the Military are well fed, while famine stalks the populace.

The DPRK has one of the world's largest military establishments, and the bulk of their first line troops are concentrated just north of the DMZ within artillery range of the ROK capital. The DPRK has the world's largest contingent of special forces troops, but virtually no air force. What little muscle the navy has is vested in a small number of conventional submarines purchased from the old Soviet Union.

The DPRK is a proper concern of the world, and the United States, for three reasons: the security of ROK, transfer of weapons to others, and the DPRK's nuclear capability.

ROK is endangered if the DPRK should launch a new invasion into the south. Kim is constrained by the presence U.S. forces in ROK, the U.S. Navy, and other American forces either in theater, or within reach. The DPRK continues it's efforts to get U.S. troops out, but has not been totally successful. Recently, the U.S. announced troop reductions in ROK of about one third. This should still be sufficient to forestall a renewed attack, but the danger level is increased somewhat. The question is can the U.S. forces and ROK hold the DPRK until Marines arrive from Okinawa, and other forces gather to destroy the North. If the U.S. can bring even a relatively small part of its forces to bear, the DPRK is doomed, doomed, doomed. That isn't a risk that Kim is likely to take lightly, especially after the demonstration in Iraq.

The DPRK is economy is dependant upon very inefficient and ineffective small agriculture. Famine is almost always stalking the land. Most industrial capacity is devoted to the support of the military. Its transportation system is weak, with most good roads devoted to the movement and supply of the army. Electricity service is minimal, especially away from the capital, or facilities deemed important to the military. The country must import a whole lot, and it has very poor currency exchange. Kim fills the gap by selling military arms and stores to just about anyone who has the cash. Terrorists and dictators are Kim's best market, and that constitutes a continuing danger to world peace and security. On the upside, export of arms from DPRK without western intelligence knowledge is pretty hard to do. However, DPRK resources useful to the development of atomic weapons has shown up in Iran, along with early versions of long range (but untested) missiles.

Would the DPRK sell a nuclear device to terrorists, if the price were right? Many believe so, but it might be easier for the "wrong" people to acquire a weapon from among those old Soviet stocks that have gone missing. If the DPRK attempted to sell a device, might indeed bring us close to open war, and that constrains Kim from selling any of his small store of nuclear weapons. The DPRK might employ a nuclear device as part of a campaign to consolidate Korea under its rule. Targets might reasonably include US/ROK forces on the ground in Korea, ROK political targets like Seoul, targets within the Japanese islands, the Marines on Okinawa, and/or the U.S. fleet if it comes within range. Any of the above would trigger such an overwhelming counter attack that it would be a very bad idea on the part of Jong-Il. It is possible, but not probable that the DPRK would initiate an atomic attack within theater, and it currently does not have the capability of targeting anything outside theater.

My belief is that no open warfare is likely, given current conditions, in Korea for at least two years. Of course, I prejudiced by my concern for family within range of a DPRK artillery and missiles.
 
 
i think it's a little late in the election process for bush to be concerned about north-korea. i think the administration had been warned to deal with the north-korean problem rather than get fixated on iraq. but... hbg
 
 
FOX NEWS: Fair and Balanced
Anyone here live in a Communist country and able to comment on first-hand experiences?

So far it sounds like we have been reading pages out of the C.I.A. Handbook.

//BW
 
 
BlackWatch.

As a former card-carrying member of a Marxist party, I feel personally insulted.
Only freaking Stalinists confuse, on purpose, Social-democrats with enemies of the people (to later sign treaties with the Nazis).

I never actually lived in Cuba, but I came and went often enough.

And of course, Dagmaraka and My Own Username don't count in your opinion (or you can't read: Bratislava is the capital of Slovakia, former Czecholosvakia; Hrvastska is Croatia, former Yugoslavia).

And you don't know Steissd, another A2Ker, veteran of the Soviet Red Army. He is very conservative, but less than the other right wing Russian in the forum.
 
 
Dagmaraka lived and she wrote some experiences.
I lived as well, although my story is not so accurate because, as it was already mentioned, I lived in by far the most free and the most developed communistic country of all times. But, still communistic.

First of all, there was absolutely no political freedom, all parties were banned except Communist Party.
Second, independent media is something you can only dream of, although Tito was much much wiser then other communistic leaders and he was very efficient in creating atmosphere where people believed that they actually are free - in media, for example, journalists were allowed to criticize politicians on lower levels, and later even on almost all levels except few politicians on top.

Also, Tito was wise enough to give people freedom to leave if they don't like it. In most European communistic countries it was extremely hard to get passport, and even if they got it, most people were not allowed to travel to West.
Yugoslavian citizens were allowed to go where ever they want. And to stay there.
Of course, all that has a lot to do with fact that Yugoslavia cut all ties with Soviet Union back in 1948th, and was later leader of Non-Allignment bloc (almost all African and Asian countries, some South and Middle American countries, Yugoslavia, Malta and Cyprus - plus Spain that was not member but participated in all conferences).

Religion was not banned, but was silently opressed. Nobody would get in trouble for going to Church or for practicing any religion, however, only in "free time". There was no chance that you could miss work on Christmas or Easter - I mean, to miss it because it's Christmas or Easter, people of course had their ways, like, calling that they're sick, etc...
But this apply only to average citizens. It was absolutely impossible that any official of Communistic Party attends Church or celebrates religious holidays.

Yugoslavia had a lot of political prisoners, however, Tito was mild in comparison to other communistic leaders, so 99% of them were "only" jailed, there wasn't much killing, or, actually, there was no killing at all (except in first few years after WW2).

Personal freedoms were on higher level then in any other communistic country, but on lower leven then in any western country. E.g. adults were not forced to be members of Communistic Party, but kids were - when we were 7, we were becoming Tito's pioneers, and in High School majority of students were becoming members of Communistic Youth - it wasn't possible to refuse it, but some were not allowed to join. However, as a member of C.Y. you had no duties actually, it was just paper.

In most communistic countries in Europe (actually, probably in all except Yugoslavia) people were very poor - I know that very well, because for most of them Yugoslavia was only country outside of Soviet bloc they were allowed to visit - I've seen plenty of kids of my age that never saw chocolate in their life, or "exotic" fruits like pineapple, kiwi or sometimes even oranges.
Yugoslavians lived pretty decently considering wealth. Unemployment rate was very low, people were able to easily afford cars, vacations and color TV, but nothing luxury.

But, as I said, that's not what life in average communistic country was.
 
 
Set (or any of the Canadians) - from what I remember about browsing around that Canadian election data last month, I think Saskatchewan is now, if anything, one of the most conservative regions of Canada, is that right?

Is there any kind of left-over political culture or tradition from CCF times still to be discerned - or has two generations of prosperity all but wiped it out?
 
 
Thanks MOU, by the way, for posting your experiences too. Yugoslavia and stories like yours force both communist apologetics and strident anti-communists to reconsider their perspectives...
 
 
Sometimes I wonder what would happen if Tito was one of those people that live 120 years (and not a single one of them is vegetarian, anti-alcoholic and often even non-smoker, by the way)  

They can talk whatever they want now, but they LOVED him. Nobody forced them to cry, and they all cried. They were paralized, and I was in perfect age to see all of that - I was kid and, actually, kids see everything. They see if someone is faking. They were not.

And then again, maybe they cried because they knew what will follow his death.
 
 
The outpouring of grief and tears by North Koreans at the death of Kim Il-Sung was immense, and apparently quite genuine. That didn't keep Kim from being a brutal, ruthless dictator directly responsible for the deaths of many North Koreans. The tears do not wash away the blood from multiple murders ordered by any dictator. Kim, with the backing and approval of the USSR and PRC, invaded ROK, and there his troops murdered lined up and executed (murdered) tens of thousands of captured South Koreans. Tito was no saint, he held together a patchwork nation by ruthless suppression of dissent.
 
 
Yep, Asherman, that is also true. Its odd how complicated life is, to see that what you write and all the things MOU noted earlier are both true...
 
 
No, of course Tito was no saint. He was just much wiser then other communistic leaders. He was still dictator.

You are right about North Koreans, and it certainly is kind of phenomena. But, part of answer can be in total brain-washing and isolation that really wasn't case in ex Yugoslavia. Borders were opened on both sides, we were able to watch Italian and Austrian TV stations and there's probably not a single "Yugoslavian" that haven't visited Trieste in Italy at least few times (main shopping zone) - and on the other hand, western tourists were coming in large numbers every summer; Italians, Germans, Scandinavians...you were able to buy foreign newspapers, etc...
 
 
In a way - and dont take this the wrong way, MOU - Tito can perhaps be compared to Franco?

Franco was a fascist dictator, but no Hitler - just like Tito was a communist dictator but no Stalin...

Both Franco and Tito came to power through bloody civil war (though thats also where the main difference pops up, seeing how Tito's main adversaries in the civil war were Hitler-sponsored fascists who furthered the Holocaust, whereas Franco started his civil war originally against a democratically elected government).

Immediately after the end of the civil war, there was a ruthless period of mass persecution both by the Titoists (late 40s, early 50s) and the Francoists (late 30s, 40s)...

Whereas in later decades both leaders, while keeping a close, uncontested grip on political leadership and tolerating no open systemic dissent, did open up their countries to outside influences, which brought both news and wealth along with the inflow of tourists from democratic Western Europe, and greatly modernized the country...

Of course, what happened after their deaths was much different for the two countries...

My father would blanch at me making the comparison between Tito and Franco <nods>. But a parallel could be made, I believe... ?
 
 
MOU, How was the educational system when you were a child? What subjects were you able to study, and which subjects were restricted, if any? How was the level of education advantageous to income? How many high school graduates were allowed to continue with college education? Has the percentages allowed to attend college changed?
I'm curious, because when I visited China 1992, only ten percent of high school graduates were able to attend college. When I visited China in 2000, thirty percent were able to attend college with less restrictions on what they could study, and the profession they wanted to choose.
 
 
MOU,

Even though I'm sure that there are many problems today, would you like to go back to the way things were during Tito's lifetime?
 
 
Asherman - I already said that in this thread, of course not, I think you missunderstood my post  

nimh - possibly. Although I think it was much more blood during Franco's regime. There was certainly blood in Tito's regime as well, but actually just in first year or two after WW2 and it was more connected with partisans eliminating Croatian and Serbian nazi supporters then with communism (of course, innocent people were victims too, but I doubt that proportions are much bigger then those of some things Allies did as well with Germans - after all, biggest atrocity by partisans/communists was near Bleiburg, Austria, where tens of thousands of Croatian Ustashe, Serbian Chetniks, but also innocent civilians were killed, with possible assistance but definitely "closed eyes" of British troops).

C.I. - educational system was tough   Kids always had a lot of subjects (and still do). There was no restrictions, because everybody had same program, it was not like in USA where you choose some subjects - nope, you had full schedule  
And everybody was allowed to continue with college, only difference was that elementary and high school were obligatory for all and totally free, while on college you had (and you still have) limits of those that go for free - for example, if you want to go to Philosophy College, everybody can apply. But, then they calculate grades from your High School (from certain subjects, different for every college), and then everybody writes exam. Then, points are again calculated and then, let's say, for first 150 government pays, and 150 more can go if they want, but they are paying themselves.
 
 
Asherman - actually, there aren't many problems today except lack of money  
 
 
 
There was certainly blood in Tito's regime as well, but actually just in first year or two after WW2 and it was more connected with partisans eliminating Croatian and Serbian nazi supporters then with communism
 

Hmm, I think we disagreed about that before... from what I've read, Tito's first years in power (at least up to 1948) were among the harshest and bloodiest, in terms of state clampdown and political persecution, of all of Central + Eastern Europe's then-Stalinist regimes...
 
 
no, we haven't disagreed about that before, but we can do it now  

Harsh maybe, but not very bloody. I mean, Tito was dictator and I am not very comfortable with "defending" him, but from what I know partisan brutal killings were during 1945/46 and later political persecutions were harsh but not bloody. During 1947 people were sent to Goli Otok (an island) for saying anything against Stalin or Soviets, and during 1948 for saying anything in their favour. But, Goli Otok was not actually like Siberia or something, vast majority of the people actually came back - again, it was still brutal dictatorship, I just think that it was not that bloody.

Of course, you can probably find "sources" that claim differently, but in Balkans people are usually tend to pump number of victims - for nazi concentration camp Jasenovac in Croatia you can find numbers from some old retarded Croats that will say 10,000 to some brilliant example of Serbian mythology that will say 2 million (I say brilliant example because it's more then number of Serbs in Croatia at that time), and most of sources use number 700,000 that Yugoslavian researchers later admited as a fake (not just for Jasenovac, but for all victims they added number of children people younger of 25 would have if they weren't killed) - I think closest to truth is Jewish researcher Slavko Goldstein that says around 100,000.
So, as well those numbers were pumped (not that this change anything in classification), it's quite probably that Croatian and Serbian post-WW2 emigration pumped numbers of victims of communists.
 
 
Some interesting info in the following link.  http://www.sdlusa.com/medialies/sunic01.htm 
 
 
hm, it won't open   I mean, link is probably okay, it just won't open...
can you quote something?
 
 
 
no, we haven't disagreed about that before, but we can do it now  
 

No, it wasn't you (I looked it up ;-)), but Relative, the Slovenian poster we had here for a while... see  here .

I seem to remember reading how, for example, even Soviet advisors that went to Yugoslavia in that brief period of "socialist brotherhood" (1945-48) were taken aback by the brutality with which Tito clamped down on all political opposition in those years... unfortunately, both Pavlowitch's Tito bio that I cited in that post and other books on that time have long dissappeared into uncategorized piles of xeroxes, so I cant look back up where I got that from...
 
 
I don't think Franco and Tito is a very good comparison.

Franco's regime was much more repressive than Tito's.
The atrocities of both the Spanish Civil War and the first years of the regime count the victims in tens of thousands (remember, Nazis and Fascists supported the Spanish Nationalists, and they shared the ideology, only the Spaniards were more religion minded).
There was not even a mock free-press.
Spaniards were not allowed to travel to any socialist country.
No political parties were allowed, and there was a religion oriented repression on social life.

MOU's description of Titoism reminds me very much, instead, of the Mexican regime before the democratic transition took momentum (until the late seventies/ late eighties).
No wonder that former Mexican president Luis Echeverra and Tito were such good friends.
We have a nice statue of Tito in Mexico City.
By the way, Echeverra, now 82, is facing an investigation on the charges of genocide. I personally think the charges are exagerated and he will never set foot on a jail.

There's a photograph at my mother's house. A very young fellow sitting between Tito and Echeverra with a glass of champagne in his hand. I'm not particularly proud of that picture, but circumstances have put me in very interesting places.
 
 
 
hm, it won't open   I mean, link is probably okay, it just won't open...
can you quote something?
 

Here's the first paragraph of c.i.'s link...

 
MARSHAL TITO'S KILLING FIELDS
Croatian Victims of the Yugoslav Secret Police Outside former Communist Yugoslavia, 1945-1990
Posted on February 17, 2002
By Tomislav Sunic and Nikola Stedul

The ongoing legal proceedings in the Hague against Serb and Croat war crimes suspects, including Serbian ex-president Slobodan Milosevic, must be put into wider perspective. The unfortunate and often irrational hatred between Serbs and Croats had for decades been stirred up and kept alive by the communist Yugoslav secret police. The longevity of artificial, multiethnic Yugoslavia was not only in the interests of Yugoslav communists but also of Western states. As a long-time Western darling, the late Yugoslav communist leader Marshall Josip Broz Tito had a far bigger share in ethnic cleansing and mass killings. Yet for decades his crimes remained hidden as well as unreported in the West. [..]
 

Article's mostly about "killings of Croatian emigre dissidents" by the Yugoslav secret police... authors are NIKOLA STEDUL, "author, former US professor in political science [..] former Croat diplomat [..] author of Titoism and Dissidence (1995)" and TOMISLAV SUNIC, "former Croat emigre [and] former president of the Croatian National Democratic Party in Croatia". (What kind of party was that?). Mind you, article also mostly focuses on attacking the The Hague War Crimes Tribunal.
 
 
Actually, I don't know much about Stedul, and Sunic was president of funny small party...it's hard to explane that to normal people actually, our political system is ridiculous, we have like 100 parties...3-4 of them are big, additional 3-4 can enter the parliament and others are just lunatics...I mean, I respect those that have no chance for any success but have some different views, but we have, like 7-8 kinds of Party of Rights (HSP, HSP-1861, HP, HCSP, HOP...). Crazy.
 
 
 
I don't think Franco and Tito is a very good comparison.
 

Well, I'm kinda hoping it's not, emotionally like - but the thought came up, I thought I'd give it a whirl... so, while we're at it:

 
Franco's regime was much more repressive than Tito's.
The atrocities of both the Spanish Civil War and the first years of the regime count the victims in tens of thousands
 

How many victims did the first Tito decade claim, compared to the post-civil war Franco years?

Hard to compare the numbers of the respective civil wars, since I think Franco bears disproportionally more blame for the Spanish Civil War's dead than Tito does for the WW2 dead in Yugoslavia...

 
There was not even a mock free-press.
 

Not in Tito's Yugoslavia either, I think, at least not up through to the sixties...

But foreign press was for sale in Yugoslavia, I gather? Was foreign press freely for sale in Spain, once the tourists started coming?

 
No political parties were allowed,
 

Not in Tito's Yugoslavia either...

 
There's a photograph at my mother's house. A very young fellow sitting between Tito and Echeverra with a glass of champagne in his hand. I'm not particularly proud of that picture, but circumstances have put me in very interesting places.
 

Interesting... ! How'd that come about?
 
 
btw, thanks for the link...I'll kill Relative for that...now he made me Yugo-Nostalgic again...
 
 
 
There's a photograph at my mother's house. A very young fellow sitting between Tito and Echeverra with a glass of champagne in his hand. I'm not particularly proud of that picture, but circumstances have put me in very interesting places.
 

WOW!  
 
 
nimh, in comparing numbers it's important weather we will count those killed in first few weeks after WW2 as war victims or not. Majority of them were soldiers of defeated armies.
 
 
fbaezer, "Interesting" is an understatatement if I ever heard of one. LOL
 
 
 
Actually, I don't know much about Stedul, and Sunic was president of funny small party...it's hard to explane that to normal people actually, our political system is ridiculous, we have like 100 parties...3-4 of them are big, additional 3-4 can enter the parliament and others are just lunatics...
 

I only know the HDZ, the HSLS, the Social-Democrats (SDP?), the HSP that you mention (far-right, right?), the HNS (fairly large, relatively non-nationalist opposition party back in the early 90s - does it still exist?), and the Istrian party and Serb party...

Not to digress all too far, but how's the HDZ rule holding up since they came back in power? Are any shades of Tudjman yet re-emerging, or is the new leader succeeding in turning it into more of a relatively modernized/westernised Christian-Democratic party? Who is doing better in the opposition, the HSLS or the SDP? Is Mesic still President? He seemed like a good guy - both back in the early nineties and when the HDZ was finally pushed out a decade later...

(Perhaps more something for a new thread...)
 
 
I know much more about Franco's atrocities than about Tito's.
I have been told by survivors about concentration camps, where there was hunger, turture and lots of excrement.
Also about forced labor camps. The defeated prisoners forced to build mausoleums for the victors.
I know directly about tens of people who were executed with a firing squad after the war. Their crime? Being relatives of former socialist or republican town majors.

Yes, there was foreign press in Spain.
And lots of Spaniards travelled to France to buy books that were prohibited inside. Many of them printed in Spanish and even in Catala and Euskera. Very few were frisked at the border.

In Catalonia and the Basque Country there was widespread language repression -and the kickback against "Castillian" has been enormous, afterwards.

MOU talks about the press critizising minor things and minor politicians... like the old Mexico, but unlike Franco's Spain, were such criticism was unthinkable.
The first independent newspapers "Cambio 16", now defunct, and "El Pas", now thriving, opened shortly after Franco's death.

And I don't recall any war cry, anywhere, as Franquista: "Viva la Muerte! Muera la Inteligencia!"
(Long Live Death! Death to Intelligence).
I think that's unbeatable.
 
 
HSLS became completely irelevant.
HDZ is in power, and SPD and HNS are main opposition parties. Pretty close is HSS as well (Peasant party). Few places in parliament also have DC (Democratic center), HSP (yeah, far right), IDS (Istrian), LS (Liberal party), Libra (oh, look, another liberal party), IDF (another Istrian party) and SDSS (Serb party, but not the only one, one of at least three).

HDZ...hmm...actually, they have transformed, and despite fact that I will never ever vote for them I think current government is best so far. "Shades of Tudjman" or of their arrogant behaviour from early 90's are re-emering (but only sometimes) exclusively in relation to opposition. Oh, and Minister of Health is completely retarded idiot. But, that's classic in Balkan politics - you always need to have one idiot that will everybody hate and will take all anger on himself.

Yes, Mesic is still president, but elections are pretty soon (still no date, but it should be matter of months). It's pretty sure that it will be close race between Mesic and whoever HDZ picks as its candidate.
 
 
Yes, the HSS, I'd forgotten that one. It was in the HSLS/SDP government as well, right, along with the Istrians - and the HNS, too?

Did I read somewhere that one of the Serb parties actually joined the new HDZ government? Wasnt that a little unexpected?

Are you a Mesic voter, yourself, if I may ask?
 
 
OK. The Tito-Echeverria story.

I was an Economics undergraduate and got a government scholarship to study in Italy. Strangely enough, our ticket to Europe was as part of the President's big entourage in a 4 country trip (because of very contorted political reasons: the President wanted to leave his younger son in Italy, and we were the screen so it couldn't be noticed; and the TV also used us: they said we were "left-wing student leaders" who supported the President, which was false). The President's son finally didn't stay in Italy: the Mexican Ambassador to FAO convinced Echeverra that it was dangerous... they had kidnapped Paul Getty's grandson and cut his ear off.

In Belgrade everybody wanted his/her picture taken with Tito. The old man agreed, and several students and reporters took their turn.

Should I add that I also watched the film "Sutjeska", about Tito's life (starring Richard Burton), sitting on the carpet of Tito's living room?
 
 
Yes. And HNS voter as well, although so far I voted for HNS only to avoid my vote going to HDZ (we use method where parties that have at least 5% enter parliament, and other votes /those for parties below 5%/ are proportionally go to parties above limit). Voting for Mesic as president is probably only completely willing vote I made so far  

Yeah, Serbs supported Sanader. It was maybe a bit unexpected, but he promised a lot and he already did a lot considering problems of refugees, rebuilding houses, almost immidiately his government payed (without court, they decided to do it) big money to survived members of one Serbian family killed in Zagreb by Croatian soldiers - I am still in a state of shock but he actually is modern european politican.
 
 
fbaezer, you even watched "Sutjeska" with your buddy Josip?    

When was that? I mean, what year?
 
 
hey nimh, are you in Netherlands now? I mean, it doesn't matter, I just want to know if I am the only idiot that is awake at 5 in the morning or you are one as well  
 
 
MOU and nimh, I was wondering about the same thing..... <smile>
 
 
birds are singing...sun is showing....and I'm an idiot  
 
 
OK, on Tito's early years again. MOU already mentioned the Goli Otok camp. Cant find back those Pavlowitch and other xeroxes, but since I have a hard copy edition, I could easily find another source - and yes, I know, its a controversial one: The Black Book of Communism of Cautois etc.

Translating:

 
Goli Otok [..] became [..] the most important camp. And it was not just any camp, because educational methods were applied that looked strongly like the methods in the Romanian camp Pitesti and that we can perhaps best label as 'Balkan methods'. Like the "hedge of dishonour", that was also called "warm rabbit". The new inmate would have to walk in between two lines of prisoners (prisoners who wanted to regain their good name or improve their circumstances) who beat him up, scolded him and threw stones at him. [..]

Tortures were daily business for the prisoners. Part of the tortures were for example "the tub", in which the prisoner was held with his head over a tub full of excrement, and the 'bunker', a kind of dark prison cell inside a hole in the ground. But the method most used by the guards/"re-educators" [..] was the duty to pulverize stones on the rocky island. To complete the humiliation of the victim the resulting grit was then thrown into the sea.

The persecution of the communists that erupted in Yugoslavia in 1948 and 1949 probably is one of the most expansive of such persecutions in Europe up to that time [..] In proportion to the number of inhabitants and the number of supporters of communism it was clearly a 'mass persecution'. According to official sources that were long kept secret, this repression has made 16,731 victims [..] Of these victims 3/4 was sent to Goli Otok and Grgur. According to the independent analyses of Vladimir dedijer in the camp Goti Olok alone there have been 31,000-32,000 people. Recent research has not progressed far enough to yield exact numbers of deaths, victims of executions, exhaustion, epidemics and suicides [..]
 

Note the 16,731 thus are not deaths but "merely" prisoners - and though there were apparently many more (over 30k in Goti Olok alone), that still doesnt necessarily mean there were many thousands of deaths there...

Also intigueing is that the victims were apparently overwhelmingly party members themselves, victims of the internal purges and show trials - like "1937" more than like "1931", thus?

Otherwise the book recounts the Bleiburg and related episodes MOU already mentioned, when the Titoists settled their scores with the defeated fascist troops directly after the war:

 
When the German capitulation approached, Pavelic departed with his troops and functionaries and their families (in total ten thousand people) towards the Austrian border. In Bleiburg, Slovene White Guards and Chetniks from Montenegro joined them, after which they surrendered to the English troops, who handed them over to Tito.

Soldiers and police agents in all of Yugoslavia observed long death marches passing by. The Slovene prisoners were brought to Slovenia in the surroundings of Kocevje, where between twenty and thirty thousand people were shot. [..] The way in which many Serbian soldiers came to their end, is sketched by Milovcan Djilas, who did not dare to give the undoubtedly gruesome details [..] 'The troops of Draza [Mihailovic] were destroyed around the same time as those of Slovenia. The small groups of Chetniks that went back to Montenegro, there reported new atrocities. [..]'
 

Hard to distinguish post-war, popular retaliation from state terror here, though the execution of tens of thousands of enemy soldiers who had surrendered themselves imho falls in the latter category, even if they were fascists. Of course retaliations were commonplace across Europe, and Yugoslavia had seen some of the worst fascist violence, but I cant think of instances of collective mass executions of tens of thousands in Western Europe, or even many in Central Europe (the Baltics, where a guerrilla war still kept raging, excluded).

I've also read (but forgot the details) about mass executions at a site in Slovenia or Croatia, where hundreds of bodies were dumped in chalk quarries or cliffs, I believe also after the Communists took over - can anyone help me place that memory, what it was about exactly?

How any of this compares to Franco's Spain I'm still not sure about, though it should be obvious that in spite of all the above horrors, my antipathies still lean even more strongly against Franco's regime...

Fbaezer makes a vivid and concise enough case about the Spanish horrors. Still, concentration/forced labour camps with hunger and torture there were in the early Tito years as well (though again, there's torture and torture). An equivalent of the mass executions of people, just because they were "relatives of former socialist or republican town majors", as there were in Spain is perhaps harder to find in Yugoslavia, though one can wonder about the "families" mentioned above who surrendered at Bleiburg and were later executed... And of course, during the war the Partisans did summary executions and house-burning just like their opponents did.

As for the point about the press being able to "critizise minor things and minor politicians" in Yugoslavia (and not in Spain), I do believe that only holds up for the last ten or fifteen years of Titos reign, definitely not already in the late fourties or early fifties.

All in all, I'll believe that Franco's regime was indeed worse. And even the above in no way parallels the Soviet Gulag of course. But Tito's early clampdowns are, I think, much less acnowledged.
 
 
Yep, sun is out here too... I have the worst problems falling asleep lately, and then when I finally do sleep, I sleep away all my free Saturday - its a destructive lifestyle I'll admit. But hey, at least I'm not alone, then, apparently ;-)

Thanks for the update on the HDZ, HNS and the Serb party by the way, very interesting. And a great story from fbaezer again of course <smiles>.

Colleague of mine once spent the night in Tito's former residence, probably his very room... Long story. Travelling (the safe parts of) Croatia and Slovenia just after the war began, one night she and her bf ended up quite lost and without a place to stay, and friendly folks guided her to a far-flung place of some grandeur where they were put up for the night, which the day after turned out to be Tito's former residence. They stayed the night in a room that was particularly large and beautiful, and had a discrete, hidden private elevator down...
 
 
This is a bit creepy to learn that two participants on this thread has some kind of "relationship" to Tito. One is a distant one, but never-the-less creepy.  
 
 
Hm, I wonder where they stayed...I suppose it was Kumrovec, Croatia - birhtplace of Josip Broz Tito, today his house is some kind of museum, but what is strange is that I really don't believe they would give someone to sleep there. But, you never know  
However, I don't think Tito had any residences in Croatia, except Kumrovec and Vanga, small island in National Park Brijuni.
 
 
Once again, you are right about early years, but those years lasted only until 1948/49th, and most killings occured in 1945/46th.
Goli Otok was definitely place where people were held for no reason at all and therefore pure symbol of dictatorship, but not something like Gulag or Franco's torture camps. Simply, vast majority of prisoners lived and came home in few years.
And fbaezer is mostly right about fact that Tito's regime never jailed family members of those people and never touched intellectuals, artists or such groups...however, to be fair, it also must be said that family members of political prisoners in some cases were not able to get a job in those early years.

And, generally, you are completely right of course, slaughtering of thousands of soldiers that surrendered is crime, and my way of thinking can be completely wrong but I can't resist feeling that it's still much different when you slaughter tens of thousands of nazi soldiers that comitted terrible crimes and when you, as Franco, slaughter tens of thousands of mainly innocent people.
I am NOT saying that it's okay to slaughter Nazis that surrendered, just that it's not exactly the same as what Franco did.
 
 
 
And, generally, you are completely right of course, slaughtering of thousands of soldiers that surrendered is crime, and my way of thinking can be completely wrong but I can't resist feeling that it's still much different when you slaughter tens of thousands of nazi soldiers that comitted terrible crimes and when you, as Franco, slaughter tens of thousands of mainly innocent people.
I am NOT saying that it's okay to slaughter Nazis that surrendered, just that it's not exactly the same as what Franco did.
 

Hmm, well I basically have no qualm with the distinction between the two (I've already indicated a few times that if anything, it's a welcome one to me), but I do think it's good to question exactly how far it applies...

For example, and I'm now going to play advocate of the devil - Franco's troops also won power after a boody civil war. Their civil war started because they attempted a coup d'etat against the legitimate democratic government, so that alone puts the Franquistas in the camp of war criminals, compared to the Partisans who insurrected against fascist occupation and dictatorship. But, still, a civil war did ensue, in which the Fascists fought militias of anarchists and communists. Much has been written about the Spanish anarchist experiments, and much idealism was involved on their part. Nevertheless, the anarchists did have their own take-no-prisoners way. Priests and landowners were murdered on a large scale, there was real terror from that side too. And as the civil war proceeded to tear families apart in horror much like it has in Yugoslavia, it did become harder to easily distinguish the good and bad guys on a micro-level. On a macro-level, for sure, here you had the Republican resistance, fighting upcoming fascist dictatorship - no contest. But on a micro-level, there was bloody retaliation each way.

So when the civil war ended, and the Franquistas gathered all the enemy fighters in camps and murdered scores of them, were they - in their point of view - not merely engaging in the kind of post-war retaliation that you bring up as a relativation of sorts, for the murders in post-war Yugoslavia?

I mean, I understand what you're talking about. And furthermore, if in Spain the camps included thousands of people who were merely family of..., and in Yugoslavia they didnt (which however I'm not sure about, considering the reference above to "functionaries and their families" who surrendered at Bleiburg), then thats also a real difference. Just trying to map the proportions here.

Of course, my original comparison between Tito and Franco was one on a slightly more macro-scale: the general development of their regimes show a parallel. From getting to power through a bloody civil war, to persecuting a ruthless post-war clampdown followed by a period of hushed, stagnant control - to establishing a dictatorship that yielded no political control and allowed no political structures besides its own, but through opening up the country to foreign imports and millions of tourists brought their countries a wealth and openness to outside cultural influence other dictatorships never allowed for. In both countries, it did bring a kind of modernity that transformed the country. (Not that I dont still think it would have come faster still in a democracy.)

OK, and with that, I guess - though I'm of course curious about both of your takes on the above - I am gonna leave this thought experiment for a while, before I offend anyone... :wink:
 
 
 
This is a bit creepy to learn that two participants on this thread has some kind of "relationship" to Tito. One is a distant one, but never-the-less creepy.  
 

Heh, and my father went to Yugoslavia as one of those international volunteers to help build the trans-Yugoslav Highway of the Brotherhood of Peoples or whatever it was called (something in that vein)...  

 
today his house is some kind of museum, but what is strange is that I really don't believe they would give someone to sleep there. But, you never know  
 

Well, it was a strange year, back then... who knows, indeed?

OK, now to fan some Yugo nostalgia...

 Cyber Yugoslavia , the home of those who've felt they have no home anymore ever since Yugoslavia fell apart...

I knew a girl like that, she moved here the year before the war began, and insisted on not being anything other than "Yugoslav"... officially, I guess, according to the 'new' standards, she'd be a Bosnian Serb, but no way - her allegiance was only to a country that doesnt exist anymore. Lots of people like that, people of mixed heritage, people who emigrated back when it was one country, etc

In any case, all those can become a citizen of  Cyber Yugoslavia . "When we have five million citizens, we plan to apply to the UN for member status. When this happens, we will ask 20 square meters of land anywhere on Earth to be our country. On this land, we'll keep our server."

And:  Tito's Home Page , for when you want to listen to some of those speeches, songs or download a Tito screensaver... :wink:
 
 
I've never lived under Communism either. One thing that has helped me understand what it was like to live under Soviet Communism was to read people's autobiographies who did actually live through it. Three that come to mind are "Nina's Journey", "Goodbye Tomorrow" and "The Ice Road".

A few hours reading might be time well spent.
 
 
no,you are right about Bleiburg, but that was not the camp, it was just slaughtering field at the end of WW2 - when I said that Tito hadn't jailed families of political opponents I was refering to Goli Otok - I said myself that on Bleiburg many innocent people were executed as well.
 
 
To be fair, the 'Communist Ideology' which has nothing to do with any of the historic, or existing governments espousing it, is ideologically a very wise, and progressive system, with many potential benefits for its adherents.

However it has a vital, and terminal flaw! - The human race.

Humanity, with its primitive programming pertaining to territory, violence, greed, and hierarchical structure, can not begin to entertain any egalitarian system.

Communism is anathema to human nature.

[ and the faults that have destroyed every attempt to institute it have come from the internal destructive effects of 'power', and 'greed'!]
 
 
Cyber Yugoslavia...yeah, many people are Yugo-nostalgic. Actually it's hard to explane...in that topic you gave link for, Relative said in one moment "we had beautiful childhood" or something like that...and that's truth. I really can't imagine better childhood. And better teenage years. I simply can't - anywhere in the world, including independent Croatia today.

Funny thing is that sometimes you have completely mixed emotions. I would NEVER like another Yugoslavia, but I am also Yugo-Nostalgic sometimes.

I live in a small town that is special by many things. It has four rivers and largest percentage of green areas in ex Yugoslavia. It's a beautiful town. But, the most special thing is unbeliavable, crazy, bizarre connection that inhabitants have with it. I want to travel, I want to visit every single spot on planet, but I never thought for a single moment about moving from Karlovac - and it's the same for at least 90% of people I know. One famous Croatian publicist said once "There's something magical in this town - I feel that if I stay here I will stay young forever". There are lot of bad things here and we are first that will say that. But, still, people are so incredibly attached to it.

And also...it's very multi-everything town. Before the war, about 25-30% of population were Serbs, biggest Orthodox and biggest Catholic church are some 50 meters away, Karlovac is also on the thinest part of Croatia, about 20 miles from Slovenia, and maybe 35-40 from Bosnia. It was always town with absolute croatian majority, but in the same time town with biggest percentage of Serbs (except Vukovar /talking only about towns with croatian majority - Knin had larger percentage too of course/), biggest percentage of Slovenes, and biggest percentage of Muslims in Croatia (or one of the biggest). Town with the nicest Jewish cemetary in Croatia. Town that was built by Habsburgs and where in local dialect people use enormous amount of German words. Town 50 miles from Alps and 50 miles from Adriatic Sea.

You know, things shade after a while. And sometimes I need those serbian villages around my town. Yeah, they were trying to kill me for four years, but it's kinda not the same - they should be there again. You simply feel that it's not how it suppose to be without it.
 
 
BoGoWo is quite right - not that I think that communism is some kind of great idea, but ideology itself is not bad at all - people are.
 
 
Good morning all. I also thought: "This is how nimh and MOU spend their crazy friday nights" (MOU has the journalists' alibi, but anyway)

The year I met Tito? February 1974.
You know by now I'm an anecdote teller. 3 more.
We were meeting in a restaurant with a group of the Communist League Youth and our hosts kept on standing up and going to the kitchen. We wondered why. Suddenly they came back with big smiles, chanting: Yugolavia had defeated Spain and had qualified for the Football World Cup in Germany.
Days later, we went to a meeting against Pinochet's coup d'Etat. It was in a closed auditorium full of bronze faces of Socialist heroes. Chilean socialist leader Carlos Altamirano showed up and us Mexicans chanted the slogans from the Chilean revolution we all knew by heart and were taken for Chileans.
We also went to the cinema, to watch a film by Costa-Gavras that was prohibited in Mexico. At one moment, the Yugoslav girl next to me exclaimed in astonishment: "Are they torturing him because he's a Communist?!!" That was totally natural for me, but it didn't fit in her mind... where, in any case, the Communist would be the torturer, not the victim.

---

BoGoWo took us back to basics,
He's right.
That's why Che Guevara wanted to create "a new man". He knew normal humans wouldn't stand the Communist system.
 
 
We all know what happens when people gain political power. It's a truism even in a democracy. It's the people, stupid!
 
 
CI - which is why our Founding Fathers deliberately gave us a Constitution that limited the power of the Government. It was nice while it lasted.
 
 
MOU, you a journalist? Trip out - I had you pegged as a student or something.
Fbaezer, its been some time since i last had "crazy friday nights".. Been over a year since i last exited a club at 6 in the morning to slog my way cross town in the morning light, looking for some place with people still as fucked up as I was... <grins>
Alas, alas... all I'm left with is insomnia and a bad space to wanna escape from... Hey, time to take care of my balcony while its still light. Bought some flowers and all.

MOU, Karlovac sounds wonderful, in many ways... Good friend of mine moved near there, I think (kinda lost contact with her, but I think I remember it was Karlovac, could be wrong)
 
 
Okay, what was wrong with your friend??  
See, that's another perfect example of Karlovac mind - we adore it for ourselves, but if someone from NETHERLANDS moves here we do think that this person has some....well...issues  

Main problem in Karlovac is that it's definitely town that was put back most by the war in all Croatia. Some other towns were destroyed even worse, but most of those towns were either pretty boring before as well or are at sea so they developed again with tourism soon enough. Now I am talking only about fun, nightlife, etc...
So, now you have situation that Karlovac is certainly more interesting then any western european continental town of 60,000 inhabitants - but we are still pretty disappointed. I mean, I don't know that for sure, I am supposing that with experience from Scandinavia or Austria, maybe in some countries it's different. Before the war just between rivers Kupa and Korana (that's old center of town, actually huge fortress built as protection of Turkish attacks - so, yeah, old center of town is actually huge military fortress for about 10,000 people), and that's about half mile, was six discoclubs, dozens of terraces always filled with people, live music all around, and more days with open-air events then those without it - now it's quite opposite.

But, Karlovac always had some crazy spirit, here are few funniest examples:
1) in the middle of the war - 1992/93rd, German punk band played in town, so imagine the scene...old center destroyed and dark, almost no lights on the street, and they enter small club in the middle of that center, just next to completely destroyed building, and inside they see naked waiters - naked simply because they felt like it, and, among others, croatian basketball team player that just won silver medal at Olympics, drinking with us in the dark club in f***ing destroyed town.

2) Beach party - that's one of my favourite memories. Few days before town was under heavy bombing...middle of the summer, terribly hot, and nobody is out, people still bit scared...and then out of nothing, some gang starts to give flyers and stuff for "beach party" (all rivers are forbiden zones, nearest available beach 50 miles away) next night...and they just say "take water pistols with you". So, in the middle of town, again in surrounding of gray and destroyed buildings, few hundred people gather with water pistols and similar stuff and simply splash each other for no reason (that was NOT tradition or something, it simply came out of nothing), and few minutes later, older people come as well, from those buildings...50 year old houseviwes throwing bags full of water on people's heads, absolutely nadrealistic stuff - but it was one of the best nights in my life).

3) we are small croatian town, but we were extremely small yugoslavian town   And yet, Karlovac was first ex-YU town with condom machine, second (before Zagreb, only after Ljubljana in Slovenia) with porno cinema, and as another funny fact - only town in the world with fans that in large numbers go to away games, but very few of them are supporting team on home games - they come but they sit and watch - explanation: "I don't know man, it's kinda stupid to yell here, it's better to sit and drink beers".  

Yes, I'm journalist, although it would be better for me to be student as well   I started Informatics College during war, and then during summer I used to work for local papers for extra money - they offered me a job, and later national daily paper called me, and, bye bye my college  
 
 
Holy crap i'm gone for one day and the posts doubled on this forum. Anyway nimph this is for you, i don't know if anyone answered your question but saskatchewan along with alberta british columbia and a little of manitoba are mostly conservative. the NDP (formally CCF) is prominent in manitoba and the rest is scattered all over the country except Alberta(Conservative stronghold). Liberals in Ontario, eastern provences and the north, Block Quebecois obviously all in Quebec.

-Hans
 
 
Hey i got a question (a bit off topic though) I bought this canteen at a garage sale and on it, it has U.S.
LEYSE
1945
Does anyone know if this was used for military troops in WW2 and if it is of any value??

-Hans
 
 
 
Okay, what was wrong with your friend??  
See, that's another perfect example of Karlovac mind - we adore it for ourselves, but if someone from NETHERLANDS moves here we do think that this person has some....well...issues   (
 

no, no, no! (he said & laughed before he even read on): she was croatian! originally from the krajina... i went to visit her a coupla years ago, stayed w/her in zagreb and kostajnica...
 
 
Hans, Leyse was a manufacturer of appliances and kitchen items which made mess kits for the government during the Second World War. The date of manufacture appears on the items. You would want to consult a dealer in antiques about its value. Do you have the canvas cover? That would make it more valuable.
 
 
great stories about karlovac by the way
 
 
I must interrupt this interesting thread to thank all of you for participating in such an insteresting subject, but mostly for sharing personal experiences. MOU, your passion for your home town is admirable. I must confess that I have never felt that way about any town I have lived in. What is more amazing is the people of your town! Karlovac is now pinned on my world map.  
 
 
hey, and we even have baseball C.I.  
 
 
Such a pity I came across this discussion when it's almost over :-(.

Anyway, I was also raised in a Communist country - I lived in Russia until 1991. My Own Username is very accurate when describing the Communist reality (and yes, Hrvatska definitely worth a visit - never been to Karlovac, but Istra and especially Rovinj are just stunning), but...

Maybe someone already raised this point, but for an average Joe (Ivan   ?) without any ambitions who's not into politics of any kind the differences between the two "isms" are not very striking. In a way, Communism is even a better option - the state runs your life instead of you, no mortgage's to pay, you have absolutely no chance of finding yourself unemployed... of course, the problem is that this sums up the benefits. If that average Joe attempts slightest move out of the system - he's a public enemy (OK, in most cases... there were variations, of course). I guess it's a cliche, but this system doesn't teach its subject to think and adapt; it teaches NOT to think and NOT to adapt.

Still, I believe there is significant number of people who'ld prefer that safe slavery to the dangerous world outside.

Needless to say though that the main problem is that even this security for the meek is not guaranteed to exist forever - the economic model is self-contradictory.
 
 
 
Still, I believe there is significant number of people who'ld prefer that safe slavery to the dangerous world outside.
 

When I visited Bulgaria last summer I heard the same remark. It was like 'OK we have our freedom, but do you know how hard life is, how expensive life has become?' But eventually they just have to bite the bullet and there will be better times (I hope).
 
 
It's up to the younger generation to improve the economy by their education and risk taking and entrepreneurship for creating business. There must be a banking system that will provide the money for the improvement of their social overhead capital, and for investments in business ventures. It's very difficult (if not impossible) for the older generation that have experienced being provided for all their lives to change.
 
 
rick wrote : "When I visited Bulgaria last summer I heard the same remark. It was like 'OK we have our freedom, but do you know how hard life is, how expensive life has become?' But eventually they just have to bite the bullet and there will be better times (I hope). "... the situation in the eastern part of germany has still not stabilized even though more than ten years have passed since re-unification. saw a report in a german news-site recently dealing with this subject. the german goernment established a commision to get advice on how to deal with the high unemployment and other economic problems. i understand that the commision could not come up with any quick and drastic solutions to the problems. i also noted that the new german president (not the chancellor) is suggesting that a low dose of "thatcherism" might be in order ! perhaps walter can give us some more insight. hbg
 
 
Lot of people say unemployment in east-germany is still so high because after unification, the east basically bought into the west's welfare state arrangements, when the state's economic health couldnt in fact "carry" or compensate for such arrangements... eg, considering the state of the east-german economy, the only new jobs you could add to the labour market on any massive scale would be jobs so low-wage that they cant compete with unemployment benefits, and so on. That kind of argument. Proposed solution: a dose of thatcherism, especially for the east.

One problem with that. Further east still, in countries like Poland, they do have the thatcherite freedom for enterprises to create very-low-wage jobs, they dont have the welfare state trappings, they did implement thatcherite recipes... and unemployment is just as high.
 
 
from what i know about the situation in the former east-germany (which really is very little), one of the big problems was the closing down of some fairly large enterprises that caused a lot of pollution. of course, it seemed right that the polluting factories should be closed down (i believe many were indeed beyond upgrading), but many people were thrown out of work and were not able to find other work in their communities. i guess the basic idea was a reasonable one, but there was simply not enough of an effort to follow through and provide work. (i believe the cost of re-integration of the former east-germany was grossly under-estimated). when we visited berlin last fall, we could definetely see the stark contrast between east and west - it seemed like someone had drawn a line between east and west, and it had still not been erased. i realize, of course, that east-germany had not received the kind of economic help that west-germany received after the war. i think it is a difficult job trying to bring the eastern part of germany up to the same economic standard as the western part.... i guess even looking at canada we see wide disparities between central and western canada and the eastern provinces (particularly the province of newfoundland has not been able to see the same economic growth as the rest of country, resulting in economic stagnation and high unemployment). hbg
 
 
Motivation is a very difficult thing to gauge in any population. What I have found as a truism is how the Chinese have succeeded in many countries they have settled into, while the natives seem to remain in similar circumstances as their past generations. Anybody have the answer?
 
 
The collapse of any system will result in a period of chaos. The period of chaos may be short, or very long, dependant upon how catastrophic the collapse was. The Enclosure Acts pretty much spelled the end of the rural English economic structure. Thousands were thrown or forced off the land. Urban areas ballooned and the gap between wealth and poverty were extreme. So extreme, that some like Marx and Engles believed that the system would be destroyed by a revolution started and led by exploited factory workers. The suffering among the middle and lower classes was so acute as to be almost unbelievable to most of us today. Terrible suffering, but in the long run of great benefit for the whole nation.

The shift to an industrial economy and transitional capitalism made it possible for the British to oppose Napoleon on a near equal footing. English trade was an important part in gaining and keeping its empire until 1945, and that benefited the English economy. One little island, but tough and capable of standing against others many times larger, richer and with greater resources. The suffering that accompanied the Enclosure Act(s) was succeeded by the development of a world-class economy that has benefited most Britains ever since.
 
 
No, I don't have an answer but people seem to think that first generation immigrants generally are motivated to get ahead. Generalizing is a risky thing. Maybe they are just ignorant of all the cast in stone problems in the places they land. Or maybe they are selfselecting as the group that left whatever country they left.
 
 
 
from what i know about the situation in the former east-germany (which really is very little), one of the big problems was the closing down of some fairly large enterprises that caused a lot of pollution.
 

Hhmmm... most of ex-communist eastern europe went through an extensive phase of "de-industrialisation" in the nineties, i dont think it has much in particular to do with new environmental laws and rules (which still aren't especially strict further east).

What it does have to do with is... well, all kinds of stuff. Soviet communism hugely invested in heavy industry, which was credited with higher ideological/strategical value than the production of consumption goods; much of it was part of the so-called military-industrial complex. Furthermore, with the imperative of pumping up production in each five-year-plan, the emphasis was on quantitative expansion (more of the same), rather than on qualitative innovation or exploring new products or technologies. The result was that after '89, the new East-European governments looked at what the country had in terms of industry, and saw heavily polluting, inefficient, old-fashioned plants churning out stuff that often had lost most of its global market value or had been focused on supplying the soviet army in a weapons race that was now abruptly deconstructed. Useless, useless, useless.

At the same time the heady urge to privatise, liberalise, sell off and modernize in those early years also did harm. The overwhelming majority of the old factory complexes was practically unsellable, and their losses a huge drain on the already overburdened budget. So a whole lot of them were simply closed down altogether, or sold off for a pittance, often (especially further east and south) to fraudulent biznessmen who used the ownership to launder money or what have you, quickly bankrupting the places after all. At the very best, a company could be sold to a Western investor, whose arrival was so welcome that few if any rules or conditions were imposed - and the investor would usually succeed to fire most of the workers and save only the part of the company that had the best chance of success, automatizing it where possible.

A lot of all that was necessary or at least unavoidable; some of it was plain criminal. But the end result was indeed in many cases a far-reaching de-industrialisation, leading to massive lay-offs of often older, low-educated workers in polluted, industrial zones - not the kind of people who easily find their way into the new jobs that did spring up elsewhere, in tourism, services, commerce and IT...
 
 
osso, Sometimes generalizing is the only way to seek answers.
 
 
Asherman has a point about enclosure acts, but i would point out that individual acts of enclosure proceed over a periof of literally centuries. In addition to enclosure, the Corn Laws assured that only the most productive operations could afford to weather long periods of surplus. The Corn Laws basically assured that foreign imports would not sell for less than the national "floor" on grain prices, as established by simple supply and demand. Given that consideration was not given to costs of transportation, storage and milling, it was often cheaper in times of surplus to simply buy foreign grain which arrived in the ports, mill it nearby, and ignore the domestic market. This very quickly ended a life-style of centuries of the migrant agricultural worker--many of whom had taken up the work as a result of being thrown off the land due to enclosure. Farmers tightened their belts, and put their families to work, knocked down tenant cottages to open grazing land which could be put in grain as the market dictated. Economists have often pointed to the Corn Laws and the prices of grain in England as evidence of the stability of the economy--but in times of want, demand never reached it's potential, because of the poverty of itinerant agricultural workers, and cottage spinners and weavers (losing their livelihood to factories), and factory workers--they'd have surely bought more bread for themselves and their families if they could have afforded it. Factory workers were frequently co-erced in to employing their own family members, wives and children, on starvation, piece-work wages--and all the while, trades associations were banned by law. In 1819, with the depressive effects of the Corn Law at their height, and just about all of the available common land already stolen by enclosure acts, workers decided to hold a "monster meeting" at St. Peters fields outside Birmingham--and the attack of British Cavalry lead to a massacre known ever after as the Peterloo Massacre.

"Thatcherite" measures are often simply a way of avoiding the hard work of building an equitable consumer market, with both incentive and protection of personal rights. The grinding poverty of England as it slogged and staggered through the "birth of the industrial age" (a good deal of conceit in that, by the way) assured levies for the Royal Navy and for the Army--and their aristocratic officers described these economic waifs as "the scum of the earth." It took capitalists literally centuries to understand the equation that well-paid workers consume the goods which make their world go round. The potentially fatal myopia of capitalists is that they fail to acknowledge that markets and resources are limited, and that everyone benefits to the uttermost when no one is left unable to make a reasonable effort to attain the benefits. In short, to my mind, greed is only slightly perferable to ideological righteousness, and ought never to go unwatched and unchecked.
 
 
nimh : let me again state that i'm not fully familiar with the situation in the former east-germany... here are just a few points at random... we made a daytrip from hamburg into the former east about a year or two after re-unification. we stopped in a small town to visit a museum. the air was so polluted from burning soft coal (braunkohle) that we could hardly breathe. we coughed and spit, and thought our lungs would give out. we than spoke to some of the locals who told us about the pollution problem... to them it was just a normal day, but they told us that a lot of the children and older people were suffering from asthma and other lung diseases. i also remember seeing the pictures from some of the factories that were being closed down... the level of pollution was almost unbelievable. (it reminded me of my earlier years in germany when our parents had friends who worked in the local copper-smelter and the lead-battery-factories ; i don't think any of them lived long enough to ever collect a retirement pension ! ). i see the most serious problem for germany (and perhaps europe and the world) in the young people living in the eastern part of germany who cannot find work; they are they best candidates for becoming extremists of the right or left - and i think both extremes are dangerous for any country in the wold. if there is no hope, what have you got to loose... (makes me shiver !). hbg
 
 
Hamburger, yes, for sure pollution is a great problem - much of it rooted in the ways communist industry was run - well, the stuff i noted in my post above...

Not that the western countries didnt have such pollution too, half a century or a century ago... But i do think it persisted longer and excesses were sharper in the communist world, partly because of the emphasis on quantitative expansion rather than qualitative improvement, and partly because the state's stranglehold on the media and public action made it impossible for anyone to speak up about it or wage action on it...

Interestingly, some of the first openly dissident activity directly prior to the 1989 upheavals was on the part of environmental groups, for example in Bulgaria (Ecoglasnost) and Hungary, where the environmentalists were called Blues rather than Greens, because of their focus on the Danube (resistance to the Gabcikovo dam etc).

My post really wasnt meant primarily to disagree with you, just to try to cover the bases in explaining some of the main causes behind today's de-industralisation and accompanying unemployment... I hope it made sense... I know I can be wordy sometimes.
 
 
nimh and hbg, It's not only in underdeveloped countries that have polution from factories. Here in Silicon Valley, the tech capital of the world, we have polution from factories that builds pc's, ic's, and other high tech equipment. I'm not sure how long before our underground water system is completely poluted by chemicals. It's scary.
 
 
 
Motivation is a very difficult thing to gauge in any population. What I have found as a truism is how the Chinese have succeeded in many countries they have settled into, while the natives seem to remain in similar circumstances as their past generations. Anybody have the answer?
 
I'm not sure the natives are in similar circumstances; in fact, China is pretty much developed now. Take a look at this table:

 http://www.nationmaster.com/graph-T/eco_gdp_gro_198 

China's GDP grew by whooping 382% since 1980. There are German luxury cars on the streets, capable banking system, Beijing airport is as modern and sophisticated as any European airport. Actually, China's today's economical maladies seem to be caused more by the ultra-fast uneven growth.

However, economic system of today's China is waaay far from Communism.
 
 
Galilite, I have visited China twice, and know how quickly they are developing economically. My last visit was in 2000, and I have witnessed dramatic developments in both Beijing and Shanghai. China's economy was slow to develop even ten years ago, and the new economy of China today is much changed - pretty much from the change in political leadership.
 
 
What I believe concerning (East-)Germany is that it's also time for a better approach between "West"-Germans and "East"-Germans. For what I know there are a lot of people from "West"-Germany who look down at the "East"-Germans, and a lot of people from "East"-Germany who see the "West"-Germans as arrogant, know-it-alls etc. But because I'm not a German, nor have I ever lived in Germany whatsoever, I would like to know from Germans like Walter, Thomas, Thok (and hamburger) how these "groups" think about each other (is there really a big difference?).

PS: I said Germans, but of course I mean everyone who has a clear view on this.
 
 
Ah.. but the East-Germans are starting to hit back!

Big hit coupla years ago:

 
Die eingefleischten Kellner wissen
dass die Mnner im Osten besser kssen
dass die Mdchen im Osten schner sind
weiss heutzutage jedes Kind.

Dass die Mauern im Osten besser halten.
Dass die Meisten hier meistens etwas
schneller schalten. Dass eigentlich fast
alles etwas besser ist als im Westen.

Jeder wird mal die Erfahrung machen
dass die Kinder im Osten fter lachen.
Dass sie sich auch ber kleine Sachen
freuen,und wenn sie bse warn es spter
auch bereuen. Dass die Omis im Osten lieber
sind. Dass jeder Spinner hier auch nur
halb soviel spinnt. Dass hier eigentlich
fast alles etwas besser ist als im Westen.

Refrain:
Trotzdem sind wir wir sind ja so schn viel
zu bescheiden wir sind doch schn.
Trotzdem kann uns immer noch
nicht jeder leiden. Wir sind ja so schn.

Trotzdem sind wir wir sind ja so schn
viel zu bescheiden.Wir sind ja so schn.
Dass wir irgendwan die Siger sind lsst
sich nicht vermeiden.

Jeder weiss das wir hier immer unser
Bestes gaben. Und das auch Ossis
denn Golf erfunden haben.
Das die Zeit hier nicht zu schnell
vergeht weil sich die Erde
etwas langsamer dreht.

Das die Butter hier mehr nach Butter schmeckt
und der Sekt auch etwas mehr nach Sekt.
Das eigentlich fast alles etwas besser
ist als im Westen.

Refrain:
Trotzdem sind wir wir sind ja so toll viel
zu bescheiden wir sind so toll.
Trotzdem kann uns immer noch nicht
jeder leiden. Wir sind ja so toll.

Wir sind ja so toll
viel zu bescheiden.Wir sind ja so toll
das wir irgendwann die Sieger sind lsst sich
nicht vermeiden.

Dum schaba.......
Jeder weiss das die Sonne im Osten erwacht
und um den Westen meistens einen groen Bogen macht.
Das der Wind von Osten meistens etwas
frischer weht.

Das die Semper Oper nicht in Dsseldorf
steht. Dass Martin Luther auch schon
ein Ossi war. Und das im Osten berhaupt
alles wunderbar. Und das eigentlich fast alles
etwas besser ist als im Westen.

Refrain:
Trotzdem sind wir wir sind ja so gut
viel zu bescheiden wir sind ja so gut.
Trotzdem kann uns immer noch nicht
jeder leiden. Wir sind ja so toll

Wir sind ja so toll viel zu bescheiden.
Das wir irgendwann die Sieger sind das
wir irgendwann die Sieger sind das
wir irgendwann die Sieger sind lsst sich
nicht vermeiden.
 
 
 
 
PS: I said Germans, but of course I mean everyone who has a clear view on this.
 

Biased :wink:
 
 
I said Germans ( except Walter Hinteler )... everyone who has a clear view on this ( except Walter Hinteler )  
 
 
Hey guy's i haven't been on in a while and it looks like a\my topic is pretty popular. oh ya setanta i have the covering, how much more worth does that add (sorry don't know if what i just said was grammatically correct...) oh ya and one day i remember it actually quite vividly but a couple of guys called the "stasi" or something came to my house in 87 anyone know who they were (I think they were secret police).

-Hans
 
 
Stasi were the secret police. Archives are now open and if you wish, you can go through your files that Stasi kept. They managed to discard some, but most files were preserved.
We have had visits from State Security (Czechoslovak secret service) regularly - about once every 4 months. Every 1968 anniversary, or creation of Czechoslovak Republic anniversary, or any other important date when protests were suspected, my father would be locked up for 48 hours. Or 2X 48 hours - they would let him walk out of detention and take him right back, as 48 hours was a legal limit to detention without any charges. hm. On November 18th 1989, during the Velvet Revolution, me and my mother met the two secret police officers that conducted housechecks in our house for years in the main square where the masses gathered. They were ringing their keys and yelling along with the crowds: United we stand! And Havel for President! Freedom! I discovered muscles I didn't even know I had in my stomach, it was turning like a centrifuge.
 
 
 
Every 1968 anniversary, or creation of Czechoslovak Republic anniversary, or any other important date when protests were suspected, my father would be locked up for 48 hours. Or 2X 48 hours - they would let him walk out of detention and take him right back, as 48 hours was a legal limit to detention without any charges.
 

Sounds terrible!  
 
 
well, yes. But we were lucky that he was jailed in the eighties. If it was the fifties, might have been a different story. 1989 Revolution got him out of jail after 2 1/2 months (he was jailed in August - the 1968 anniversary a-coming). This time he was charged and it seemed he might get 10 years. For writing. And voicing his opinion of Radio Free Europe. Well, actually he got out one week before the actual revolution, thanks to the concerted efforts of Amnesty International, International Helsinki Federation and other groups that picketed in front of the Court of Justice in Bratislava. Nobody can convince me communism wasn't 'really that bad'...
 
 
 
Nobody can convince me communism wasn't 'really that bad'...
 

I can imagine! Or actually, I can't imagine how communism was, but reading your personal story, I can imagine you don't agree with 'communism wasn't really that bad' (what was my actual point).
 
 
Our situation had good parts to it. We were surrounded by incredible people - writers, playwrites, actors, philosophers,.... who would meet clandestinely to talk, plot, write, perform... I missed it terribly, but damn, would not go back for the devil!
 
 
I traveled through East Germany, Poland, and the Soviet Union (now Belarus and Russia) in August of 1989 on a bare bones Cosmos bus tour.I was convinced that the system was on the verge of collaspe. Everyone still gave lip service to the old slogans but there were few true believers to be found. The black market was thriving and a pack of Marlboros was the currency of choice.Gorby had just allowed the Hitler/Stalin Pact of 1939 to be acknowledged. Kids were paying off the local militia police with a few $ to get the hard currency they knew was going to outlast the system.A rouble was $1.60 at the official rate and worth about 10 cents on the street.The only bargains to be had were large laminated posters of Lenin,Marx, and Engels in bookstores which were great for my classroom.My saddest memory was seeing the cross placed in Berlin for what turned out to be the last person killed trying to escape to the West(17 yrs. old) just a few months befor it all began to collaspe.How anyone could defend a system that was so evil in practice defies logic.
 
 
Please do this
Can someone just write out a straight list of why communism is bad?  
 
 
Government owns all businesses.
Everybody gets paid for producing junk.
Everybody gets all the necessities of life; shelter, food, and medical care, but it'll never be of sufficient quality and quantity.
No competition for producing quality goods or services.
Everybody pays the same for everything.
There will be shortages of what is needed or is in high demand.
No freedoms.
Government controls everything.

The total population losses it's motivation to work.
Depression is the norm.
Life values are diminished.
 
 
The 10 contradictions of Communism
(Cuba, early 80s -not so bad times-).

1. The State says it pays the citizens for their work, but it doesn't.
2. The citizens say they work, but they don't.
3. Even if citizens don't work, the Production Plan Goals are met.
4. Even if the plan goals are met, there is nothing at the State stores and the rationing cards are meager.
5. Even if there is nothing at the State stores and the rationing cards are meager, there is food at the citizens' tables.
6. Even if there is food at the citizen's tables, the citizens dislike the government and the system
7. Even if the citizens dislike the government and the system, the media says they love both.
8. Even if the media says the citizens love the government and the system, the State acts as if they hate them.
9. Even if the State acts as if the citizen hate the government and the system, it does nothing to change the situation.
10. Even if the State does nothing to change the situation, the media says it does.
 
 
Communism is a wonderful government system, on one condition: the people running the show must be either pathologically honest, or total robots. It's a system which is predicated on Hegel's view that the masses exist only for the betterment of their betters - exactly the same philosophy as feudalism; the main differences being that (a) you could climb above your birth-station, (b) you could be dropped back and lower on very short notice, and (c) the economy was built on sky-castle theory.

Humans just aren't honest enough to run a government. Any government!

There is debate whether Stalin or Hitler were the worst: in long-term effect on the country, regime-longevity and body-count, Stalin wins with a lay-down Mizere. Had they managed their country's economy properly, there is a chance that the USSR would still be a major power.

Recent developments in Bush-Land's political philosophy (exacerbated by their mindless moral and sexual hypocracy) indicate that the US is busily running itself into the same ideological and economic quagmire.
 
 
To answer (simply) to the question of the Poll, I'd say that it's the USA who abused the most of this system, as it served as a pretext for loads of stuffs...
  Now I think I'll run away before being caught by an agent or another...
 
 
since C.I. made the most serios answer; I will comment his - BUT, you have to keep in mind that I lived in the by far "best" and most free communistic country ever (Yugoslavia) and that life in most of (probably all actually) other communistic countries was much worst. So:

 
Government owns all businesses.
 

correct.

 
Everybody gets paid for producing junk.
 

correct

 
Everybody gets all the necessities of life; shelter, food, and medical care, but it'll never be of sufficient quality and quantity.
 

mostly correct. In Yugoslavia it was more then sufficient quality, but I doubt many people in Soviet Union, Poland or Hungary would say the same.

 
No competition for producing quality goods or services.
 

correct.

 
Everybody pays the same for everything.
 

correct

 
There will be shortages of what is needed or is in high demand.
 

mostly correct. In most of european communistic countries there were shortages of life-important groceries. We in Yugoslavia were in much better position, since almost immidiately after WW2 we cut all ties with Soviet Union, so we had moderately good relations with West - however, ocassionaly we had shortages of stuff like coffee, detergents, or some kinds of meat.

 
No freedoms.
 

mostly correct - in Yugoslavia people had SOME freedoms of classic democracy, although we also lacked some (no political freedom, and censorship in media considering criticism of leaders) - in other countries lack of freedom was on the bizarre level - they even lacked freedom to leave country, it was almost impossible to get passport. Yugoslavian communists were at least bit smarter on that level - everybody gets passport, so if you want to leave our "best society in the world", well - please leave.

 
Government controls everything.
 

correct - although in 80's private sector was allowed on some levels in Yugoslavia (for example, my father had private software company)

 
The total population losses it's motivation to work.
 

absolutely correct. world leaders in holidays and sticking them together (what? Republic Day is on Wednesday? How cool, we will work only on Monday and Tuesday, and then skip Thursday and Friday because weekend is coming)

 
depression is the norm.
 

probably correct. In Yugoslavia I can't say it was like that, but, as I said, we were way ahead others. Which also had psychological effect, since Hungarians, Czechs, Slovaks, Poles, Eastern Germans...were coming to Yugoslavia on vacation since it was only country where they were allowed to go outside of Soviet pact. So, when they were shocked to see chocolate, colour TV's, computers, etc (and sometimes even ordinary things like large stocks of milk)....in our stores, available to everyone, that makes you think "wow, we are so cool, we have all that stuff". So, we weren't really depressed.

 
Life values are diminished.
 

correct. society is everything. although, it's not only communistic problem in modern world.
 
 
Hey MOU is back! I think you were gone for a while? Very cool to see you again.

Good points all, btw. Would add that some of the limited economic freedoms you mention for the Yugoslav case increasingly held true for Hungary with its "goulash communism" too. And there were slight differences from country to country. In Poland for example, many individual small farms survived through communism, while in most (all?) other communist countries they were collectivized without exception.

One last point, without diminishing in any way the costs or horrors of communism:

 
 
depression is the norm.
 

probably correct. In Yugoslavia I can't say it was like that, but, as I said, we were way ahead others. Which also had psychological effect, since Hungarians, Czechs, Slovaks, Poles, Eastern Germans....
 

Suicide rates in Hungary were always the highest in the world; many other communist countries ranked high too (though there were also countries that ranked very low, religion apparently being a decisive factor). However, it was after 1989/1991 that suicide rates across Eastern Europe, and in particular in the Former Soviet Union (FSU), positively skyrocketed. FSU states now collectively dominate the top of the list, the Muslim republics excepted.
 
 
it's true, at least in "Yugoslavian" (now Croatian, Slovenian, Bosnian, Serbo/Montenegrian and Macedonian) case - depression is much higher and larger in transition then in communism. To be honest, as far as ex Yugoslavia is concerned, we all live much worse then during communism - for example, before all people went to summer vacations on seaside resorts. Today there is enormous number of people that can't afford it (I would be unable to afford it if it wasn't for family house we already have on seaside), when I was teenager, starting to go out and stuff, parents easily could afford to give me money every single day during all summer and all weekends throughout all year - for cinema, coke, hot-dog, burger, basketball game, whatever I wanted - and we weren't rich family. Now it would be impossible for me to give that to my daugher - luckily, she is only 5  

And one...well, I just have to swear...one f**king thing that can't leave my head...nobody is smiling anymore, nobody is out anymore, nobody is having fun together anymore...we were damn happy kids, we were always out, we had loads of fun, our parents were out all the time with their friends...and everybody was smiling damn it. Now people are so blue and so serious, and even kids are lame...nobody is out, they just stare at computers or playstations at their homes, they don't play street soccer, they are not sitting on benches late at night...this period really sucks.
 
 
communism sukked!!!!
 
 
MOU, When I visited Croatia/Balkans last year, we were treated to have a home-hosted meal with a Croatian family in Osijek. Their home and family looked quite happy and content with their life. The children were all smiling and playing around while we ate our meal, and while they showed us around their home. They raised some chicken (or something that looked like a chicken, but smaller), a pig, and some other animals. Vukovar was another story; it still had many bombed out buildings, and the people at the produce market didn't look all that happy. The contrast was quite noticeable.
 
 
 
Mainly after the stalin years i want to know what was so bad in soviet russia.
-Hans
 

You had a society ordered from the top down with no responsibility in the picture anywhere at all. American business consists of complex interconnected and self-regulating systems in which somebody starts to lose money the first minute anything in the picture goes wrong.

In the soviet system, when something went wrong, somebody just filled out a report and passed it on up the line until it got to some place where it was filed.

Whenever I've spoken with russians old enough that their parents or grandparents lived under the tsars I've always asked the same question, i.e. was life worse under the tsars or the commies ('zhisn buila xhuzhe pod tsaryami ili pod kommunistami?' or some such) and the answer always comes back the same way, i.e. that life under the tsars was so bad it seemed impossible to picture it getting any worse at the time; nonetheless it didn't just get a little bit worse. After fifteen or twenty years of commie rule, they were talking about tsarist times like those were the good old days.
 
 
Gidday Clueless, awful 5h1tty see you, really spoiled my day. Is that a Norte-Americano accent there? Gringoism goes well with your monikker. No I am not talking about that obviously talented, very close advisor to a President of the USA. She did something useful - you just dribbled all your lunch (Big Mac and Coke, right?) down your front.

This forum is restricted to intelligent people, so let's get on with the show.

Communism was thought to be the logical progression directly from feudalism to a state infinitely better than democracy, intended to bypass entirely that rather pathetic Greek ideal. Communist theology has a lot of good ideas, and some brilliant ones. It has only one problem: it can't work.

What poisoned communism was the same genetic ailment that infects democracy: an incurable condition called human greed. You accumulate a little power/money, you "leverage" it to climb further up, you can afford lawyers and you go on from there. Unfortunately, monkies are best at climbing: lookat the real bushie-tailed one we still have gibbering at the very top of that tree over there!

Communism itself wasn't the problem! The big flaw was and always will be that greedy humans drove it. Stalin et al inherited and embraced a really repressive monarchic Hegelian system: peasants exist solely for the betterment of their betters. They didn't change much, nor did the Chinese nor the North Koreans nor... They changed only the mode and method of promotion into the ranks of power and of course boosted the functioning security system.

The Founding Fathers over there on the West Atlantic coast did just about exactly the same. They may have been honest and straight, but they failed to pass on their ethics: who invented the FBI?

In communist countries promotion was the result of political skullduggery; in "the west" financial shenannigans always got you to the top: a big-deal Seppo was convicted this week of defraudng eleven billion -- yes eleven giga-bucks: another presidential candidate drops by the wayside.

The Brits deserved everything they both gave to and got from America: the Revolutionary War almost sunk England's economy and the vaunted British Justice System damn near did the rest. One of the things they gave was a burning greed, a Hegelian disconcern for anyone else.

Unfortunately, I know of NO equitable systemwhich actually enforces honesty; there is no good system to govern humans. We're stuck with what we have.

I see no real division, no dividing-line between religion and politics, or between religion and delusion, or between politics and bu115h1t: if you BELIEVE that your mob is right, then your mob is right for you. People believe what they want: political poseurs, religious nuts; demagogues and liars; demons and monsters, talking clouds, wimmin flying-in on broomsticks...

But if you start to shove it down my throat or bite my hip-pocket, I'll shove it straight back up your arse. Sideways!

Sorry to be so pessimistic fellers, but as soon as we invent any form of government even at village-level, we have (a) objectors & (b) control-freaks; and if the objectors get too noisy or too close to the truth, well, as the American poet Leonard Cohen said last century:

 
Give me absolute control
Over every living soul
And lie beside me Baby
That's an order...
 

People In Power tend always to lock dissenters up in nasty places, expel them from the group; even main and kill them. In Singapore they called it Operation Cold Storage; in Iraq it was and still is Abu Ghraib; in the UK Dartmoor, in Russia Lubiyanka and the Gulag (still going); in the USA it was The House Committee on Unamerican Activities or the FBI (each worse than the other) and in Afghanistan it is Guantanamo Bay. In Australia we lock up illegal immigrants way out in the desert: winnim, kids the lot.

Apropos the CIA and the Tiger Cages of Con Son Island, Cohen again:

 
Give me back the broken night
My mirrored room, my secret life
It's lonely here
There's no-one left to torture!
 

Fortunately the American Revolution forced the Poms to export a lot of talent (even thieves rogues and greedy soldiers have certain skills) to Australia; that beautiful land was invaded, captured, taken and converted. Shaken and stirred; united; add several buckets of common-sense and there you have us in our full, egalitarian, Bronzed-Ozzie glory. Somehow, and I really don't want to know how, we have kept our polies reasonably straight: we're orrite mate!.
 
 
Allsix, I disagree with your thesis that "greed" is the failure of capitalism and communism. "Corruption" is the failure of both systems. In capitalism, greed in and of itself drives and motiviates its participants. In communism, nothing is available to motivate it's workers. Both systems are at the opposite sides of the spectrum - and what is good for one is usually not good for the other.
 
 
Cicerone Impostor, I agree to the extent that the hoi-polloi had a hard time accumulating "wealth": they had only the bottle of vodka/kilo of ham/open legs with which to grease the ways. The greed was at the level where officials etc could for instance have hard-currency bank accounts; and the after-dinner games included who was senior enough to lock up an account-holder and Guantanano-Bay the right numbers out of him.

Power is more addictive than sex, drugs and rock-n-roll together: whether capitalist, communist or catholic, greed and corruption go together in the quest for power just like, as in that Doris Day song, a horse and carriage. The ultimate rush is Cohen's

 
Lay beside me Baby,
That's an order
 

or even

 
C'm-on, give us a little head-work there Moni...
 

THAT is corruption.

It is only the personal honour of the leadership that prevents "leakage of influence". George the First (Washington) and the Founding Fathers may have been straight and honest but Commander-In-Chiefship being not heireditary, the ethics were well diluted by the time people like thetwo recent Georges (41st and 43rd) got their fingers on the trigger.

Hey, even E2R's impeccable genes don't seem to have passed on properly, eh!!
 
 
Whatever "E2R's" is, I agree.  
 
 
Lizzy the second, I suppose :wink:
 
 
That's a culturally-defined abbreviation: Elizabeth Regina (Queen) with Roman numerals in the middle: E II R.

It has been opined that if Stalin has radio-frequency-activated implant chips and modern-style PCs communism could have been forced to work. That's the technology with which US/Canadaian authorities tracked those crazy cows (and all home-pets) - when will we be carrying Social Security numbers permanently under our skin...?

The depression causing suicide in ex-communist countries was the result of mass brain-washing and perpetual control: as soon as this stopped the populace actually felt lost, abandoned by a system that convinced them that they were in paradise, and addicted them to certain state-sponsored benefits including cheap booze. When those physical/moral/philosophical "props" were removed and people had to think for themselves, many couldn't handle it; others saw the opportunities and ripped what they could out of a stunned system.

Sixteen-odd years after Solidarity there is still a floating population in Poland. They are not non-persons, just dropouts, human flotsam and jetsam: during the very cold period one slept in our stair-well. The surprising thing is, he always has enough money to be swaying-drunk by lunch-time...

In the medical profession the term is triage : when you don't have the resources to fix everything you work on problems that will respond; the hopeless cases come last. These dropouts dip out everywhere: I've seen them in my home town in Oz, in Bombay and Jakarta, in the heart of Washington DC; in Warsaw, Prague, Amsterdam, Brussels and London.

The Bible says the poor will always be with us: triage is a fact of life. So are TV advertising, political promises and religious chicanery.
 
 
I would say China is more and more parted from the communism now. As what i've known from some sources, it actually has sentence like "market economics or plan economics are just economic methods, plan economics can be used in capitalism method and the market economics can also be used in communism." on their text book. Which means the Chinese recognisees the capitalism is just a economical method, which will not be bothered whether a state is a communist or not. Thus, China had adapted the free market system into its plan market system since the "open door" policy was introduced. The previous president Deng even said "no matter it is a black cat or a white cat, as long as it can catch rats, then it is a good cat." when ccp reviewed the Chinese economy.
The Chinese actually are very realistic and down to earth on many Chinese views, if you look at it's history, you will find that when most of the world's countries were under controlled by religions, and struggling with the religious wars, the Chinese didn't. Neither the Chinese originated Confucian nor the Taoist ideologies become de facto religions, and none of the religions had successfully control China and the Chinese. Look at the Communism in China, the orthodox communism had succeed in most of the former communist states, but it failed to perform in China, though it was high once in the 50s, after the 60s, the real communism never really happened in China at all. Especially after the death of Mao and the fall of the Gang of four, Deng managed to develop a new type of Chinese style communism, which is a mixture of communism and capitalism. Though the political reform after the 90s is slow, in contrast, the social and economical reforms are dramatic. I believe the Communism are not really accepted by the Chinese, not even the 63 million ccp members. Now they even allows the capitalists to enter the congress, and join the ccp. Most Chinese now are actually more concerned about the living standard rather than what political system they are having. As what Deng said " no matter it is a black cat or a white cat, as long as it can catch rats, then it is a good cat." is so true.
Many Chines friends of mine told me that China now is searching a third way to reform its political system, neither communism nor western style of political system. I am not sure what China will be in the future, but i am sure it is stepping forward.
P.S. I found many Americans are quite biased on the issues that concerned with China by the American propagandas and culture, whatever on global security or human rights. I suggest you should really go to see it before you make up your minds.
 
 
 
you will find that when most of the world's countries were under controlled by religions, and struggling with the religious wars, the Chinese didn't.
 

Yes to the first part: the Religious Right ran Regan and the same mob told and still tell both Shrubs what to do. England and her vast empire were run by the Anglicans, most of the rest of the world by Rome and Mecca; the former USSR + China by communism.

I regard communism/socialism as a religion, the god of which was Marx and his mates. China is still run by Mao's successors, who have force-evolved an amalgam of Confucian Mandarinism and Marxism/Maoism. It will continue to evolve because "market forces" were practically invented by the Chinese, and what will come out of The Sleeping Dragon is anyone's guess.

An interresting book: Tom Clancey's THE BEAR AND THE DRAGON, which I have just started (I'm just past the Grand Seduction Scene). Clancey is a US patriot (who disagrees with a lot of US culutre) but I take his political analyses (plural) and desctiptions of technology very seriously. His RED STORM RISING is a Cold-War classic, describing how Russia and The West fought each other almost to a standstill; if you crave technology, read his THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.

RED STORM starts with an energy issue inside Russia: BEAR AND DRAGON takes the same theme, only a lot bigger.
 
 
I lived in a Communist country; yes, it was horrible.
Regards
Xavier
 
 
At what point will China become a democracy? Their economy is not communistic, but their government still controls most things, and their crimes against humanity leaves much to be desired.
 
 
 
At what point will China become a democracy? Their economy is not communistic, but their government still controls most things, and their crimes against humanity leaves much to be desired.
 

Talking about crimes against humanity, I think that the USA. goes first.
Regards
Xavier
 
 
I'm not talking about the US. This topic is titled, "Is communism really that bad?" Has absolutely nothing to do with the US - as far as I can see.
 
 
 
I lived in a Communist country; yes, it was horrible.

 

Hi Xavier, welcome to A2K. Where are you from? If you would like to tell us a little about the country you lived in and what it was like for you, you'd find an eager audience here, I'm sure! We're all curious folks.
 
 
 
I'm not talking about the US. This topic is titled, "Is communism really that bad?" Has absolutely nothing to do with the US - as far as I can see.
 

Yes, it has a lot to do with the USA., Sir!
You mentioned crimes against humanity and the USA goes first, then second goes the former Soviet Union.
I can also mention that in a way, the USA. has a lot to do with the rise (first) and then the fall of communism.

Regards
Xavier
 
 
 
 
I lived in a Communist country; yes, it was horrible.

 

Hi Xavier, welcome to A2K. Where are you from? If you would like to tell us a little about the country you lived in and what it was like for you, you'd find an eager audience here, I'm sure! We're all curious folks.
 

Thanks for the welcome.
I lived in the former Yugoslavia at the time of Tito, I lived in Romania at the time of Ceaucescu and in Chile at the time of Allende; I visited the Soviet Union at that time, and Hungary, Poland and Eastern Germany as well. All communist countries at that time; The most horrible experience was Chile at the time of Allende.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
Xavier, "Crimes against humanity" is a topic that, I agree, includes the US, but we're discussing communism and China (or at least I thought I was). This topic isn't about "the fall of communism," but "Was communism really that bad?" "The fall of communism" can also become a topic on it's own. Maybe, there's a middle-ground where communism and capitalism can co-exist somewhat like China of today. As the government of China gets taken over by younger men, their eventual goal might be some sort of democratic-communism as a transitional stage.
 
 
I can't believe someone actually voted Cuba. I mean, Stalin anyone? 26 million killed Hmm? Castro was just paranoid because Che Guevera was assasinated and the CIA kept sending him exploding cigars. He isn't that bad, after all. Most of his bad choices came after he became paranoid (unlike Stalin, who was paranoid his entire life). Actually, I don't know if you can really call Castro paranoid 'cuz the CIA was trying to kill him. They should have tried to kill Stalin instead...

Meh. USSR is the obvious choice.
 
 
 
Thanks for the welcome.
I lived in the former Yugoslavia at the time of Tito, I lived in Romania at the time of Ceaucescu and in Chile at the time of Allende
 

Wow   that was quite a roadtrip through life you got. We have a couple of former residents of Tito's Yugoslavia here - MyOwnUsername from Croatia is a great guy, and Relative I think is from Slovenia. But Ceaucescu's Romania, now there's a wholly different story... were your parents diplomats or something?
 
 
Xavier, What did you think to Tito? I had the opportunity to visit his tomb in Belgrade last year.
 
 
 
Xavier, What did you think to Tito? I had the opportunity to visit his tomb in Belgrade last year.
 

Well, he was a dictator and a bad one; He was a racist and a very selfish man. I think that all the problems that the country has now are due to his politics and his mismanagement.
I remember that when he was alive, nobody could say a word against him...
Did you like Belgrade? I did not. It's a poor and very dirty city.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
 
Xavier, "Crimes against humanity" is a topic that, I agree, includes the US, but we're discussing communism and China (or at least I thought I was). This topic isn't about "the fall of communism," but "Was communism really that bad?" "The fall of communism" can also become a topic on it's own. Maybe, there's a middle-ground where communism and capitalism can co-exist somewhat like China of today. As the government of China gets taken over by younger men, their eventual goal might be some sort of democratic-communism as a transitional stage.
 

Communism cannot be democratic; Chile is doing well now.
The mention of the USA in all this is only because it is directly responsible for many things connected with communism; on the other hand, you simply cannot have a discussion about one topic and not mention something related to it. Digretion is normal; I don't think this is a dictatorial forum.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
 
 
Thanks for the welcome.
I lived in the former Yugoslavia at the time of Tito, I lived in Romania at the time of Ceaucescu and in Chile at the time of Allende
 

Wow   that was quite a roadtrip through life you got. We have a couple of former residents of Tito's Yugoslavia here - MyOwnUsername from Croatia is a great guy, and Relative I think is from Slovenia. But Ceaucescu's Romania, now there's a wholly different story... were your parents diplomats or something?
 

Yes, my father was ambassador, I reserve mentioning from which country for obvious reasons. My spouse's father was ambassador from another country and that's how we met.
I don't speak Slovenian although I have been there, but I speak Serbo-Croatian since my father was ambassador in Belgrade at the time of Tito.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
 
it's true, at least in "Yugoslavian" (now Croatian, Slovenian, Bosnian, Serbo/Montenegrian and Macedonian) case - depression is much higher and larger in transition then in communism. To be honest, as far as ex Yugoslavia is concerned, we all live much worse then during communism - for example, before all people went to summer vacations on seaside resorts. Today there is enormous number of people that can't afford it (I would be unable to afford it if it wasn't for family house we already have on seaside), when I was teenager, starting to go out and stuff, parents easily could afford to give me money every single day during all summer and all weekends throughout all year - for cinema, coke, hot-dog, burger, basketball game, whatever I wanted - and we weren't rich family. Now it would be impossible for me to give that to my daugher - luckily, she is only 5  

And one...well, I just have to swear...one f**king thing that can't leave my head...nobody is smiling anymore, nobody is out anymore, nobody is having fun together anymore...we were damn happy kids, we were always out, we had loads of fun, our parents were out all the time with their friends...and everybody was smiling damn it. Now people are so blue and so serious, and even kids are lame...nobody is out, they just stare at computers or playstations at their homes, they don't play street soccer, they are not sitting on benches late at night...this period really sucks.
 

Vidim da ste iz bive Jugoslavije; odakle? Ja sam ziveo tamo jedno vreme, naucio sam malo jezik zato to moj otac je bio ambasador u Beogradu za vreme Tita. Dok smo ziveli tamo, dosta smo putovali; jako lepa zemlja ali sada je jako siromana. Meni se cini da situjacija nije dobra ali i amerikaqnci su krivi zato to su bombardovali zemlju.
Vratio sam se par puta, poslednji put je bio prole godine a stvarno sam hteo plakati. Hrvatska je jako lepa zemlja isto.
Puno pozdrava a izvinite ako moj jezik nije ba kako treba.
Xavier
 
 
Hi Xavier. I'm from Slovakia. Been reading your posts on this thread. Quite a trip you had, not many people from the Eastern block would have similar experience in that time. Romania must have been the worst, I'd imagine (I think you mentioned your family lived there, too?)
 
 
 
Yes it was that bad, and worse. It wasn't hated just by the west either. We hated it too. At least those of us who were on the 'wrong side'. But your questions are too many too broad. What are you seeking? any particular aim to this or just curiosity?
 

just because it was something we don;t like doesnt mean its the wrong side...
and comunism is a government where everyone is equal. yet human nature cant cope with that. All humans cant just be equal. many feel the need for superiority, but the concept is a good one, modified form democracy, yet the people who used this system didnt do many good things

=-=-=

and some of you guys seem really exotic. i mean, a dad for an ammbassador, and people from all over the world here.. its really kewl
 
 
revo, Welcome to a2k. The concept that all humans are equal runs into trouble from the moment that is forced into place as a government mandate. That's the reason why NCLB was a failure before they even implented any part of it. Humans are all different with different abilities, skills, interests, knowledge, education, economic background, social standing (whatever that means!), genes, and environment. Any successful system must accept the fact that everybody is different in street smarts and school smarts - and everything in between. Communism takes away the motivation to do well, because the benefits of survival are given equally to everybody whether one works or not. That's also the reason social welfare programs that gave the poor money to survive without requiring them to seek work or do productive labor was a failure; nothing was expected of them, and they complied, and their children did the same. Once they were expected to find work or lose their benefits, the whole program changed to help people improve themselves. Not magic; just simple human psychology.
 
 
welcome to a2k revo. all i mean by the 'wrong side' is that my parents were kicked out of the communist party and my father was often in prison. that's all.
 
 
o ok  

anyay, thanks for the welcomes
 
 
 
Hi Xavier. I'm from Slovakia. Been reading your posts on this thread. Quite a trip you had, not many people from the Eastern block would have similar experience in that time. Romania must have been the worst, I'd imagine (I think you mentioned your family lived there, too?)
 

Miss Dagmar:
I lived in the countries that I mentioned because my father was a diplomat but a diplomat not from Eastern Europe. It was easy to travel in those countries but since I had diplomatic passport, I didn't have problems at all.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
I'd appeciate it if posters would spell out the full wordings of abbreviations such as NLRB, which I immediately think of a national labor relations board. I may have read at some point about the history of the country under disussion but just not in the last half hour, and have read early pages here, also not in the last week. We are not all so up to date on all acronyms.
 
 
 
 
Yes it was that bad, and worse. It wasn't hated just by the west either. We hated it too. At least those of us who were on the 'wrong side'. But your questions are too many too broad. What are you seeking? any particular aim to this or just curiosity?
 

just because it was something we don;t like doesnt mean its the wrong side...
and comunism is a government where everyone is equal. yet human nature cant cope with that. All humans cant just be equal. many feel the need for superiority, but the concept is a good one, modified form democracy, yet the people who used this system didnt do many good things

=-=-=

and some of you guys seem really exotic. i mean, a dad for an ammbassador, and people from all over the world here.. its really kewl
 

Hence the qoutation marks on 'wrong side'.
 
 
I don't see anything exoting in having a father who was ambassador to several countries; he is dead now.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
I emant "exotic", sorry about the mistake.
Regards.
Xavier
 
 
I thought you meant "exciting."  
 
 
